Artist: Ol' Dirty Bastard
Album:  Nigga Please
Song:   Cold Blooded
Typed by: flabbo@hotmail.com

Y'all no nothing about the pimp game,
I wanna thank Rick James for letting me do this song
Thank you very much

Who are you?(who are you?)
Girl who do you belong to?
My point of view is
Girl I think you're hot!

If we halt
What words will I describe
There's no dictionary book
To explain how you look
Because I think you're hot!

(Chorus)
Sexy, sexy, sexy
Cold Blooded!
Girl I think you're hot!
Sexy, sexy, sexy
Cold Blooded!

Who are you?
Girl what's your name and number?
Is it true?
Girl you think I'm hot!
If we tried
To get to know each other
You might find
You couldn't trade me for another!
Cause I think you're so!

(Chorus)

Sweetheart baby,
Touch me girl where I want to me touched
Don't ever complain, gotcha in a cobra clutch
Love me tender, love me sweet
I wanna bust this nut in a superfreak
Oh you're a superfreak, fuck me anywhere
Great skin never do a do or dare
I wanna undress you, hold your loosie tight
And i won't cum all night!

(Chorus til fade)Artist: Ol' Dirty Bastard
Album:  Nigga Please
Song:   I Can't Wait
Typed by: flabbo@hotmail.com

Yo, Yo Miami
Yo Cali-Fornia
North East West and South motherfucka
Yo Check this out
This is Dirt Dog
I'm here to make you scream

(Chorus)(x4)
Big Baby Jesus
I can't wait
Nigga fuck that!
I can't wait!

I ain't no actor my shit's for real
Thighmaster
If I don't get paid 2 or 3 million dollars on Monday
I'm a bring on the ARMAGEDDON!(It's Monday)
Fuck that feeling, this fo reeling
Nigga I want my Noalin
Make it rain, hail, storm and earthquake
UHHHH! That's what I'm saving!
Play that music in your trunk
The cocaine got my ????? stuck
Nigga I'm from the ghetto
How many celebrities from the ghetto?
(Dirty your crazy, I'm crazy about your music
Dirty your crazy, you're a nutcase you're a fucking nutcase)

(Chorus)

A to the Pox doing Night Fever
Cancer, herpes, mumps, seizures
Diabetes, TV if your against me
You die easier!
Cops don't have a show whatsoever
Ain't no more doctors, ministers
Nurses can't give us searches
There won't be electric, won't be churches
Cause your body go against you
Whether it's a lie or whether it's true
You can't use violent mentalities anymore
It ain't lambskin
You can't use the word napkin
Nigga ya sleeping

(Chorus)(x3)
Hold on Hold on Hold on
HAHAHAHAH

I'm diplomatic playing pen and pad
Ratatat you're a scaredy-cat
Cause I have a tat put you up like that
You can't stand that, cause you gotta scat
You couldn't even move
Don't know how to groove
BITCH TAKE OFF YOUR SHOES
Take up the brew
Motherfucker you knew!
Fucking with the doo
Dirt Dog don't make any room

(Chorus til shoutouts)

I want to give a shoutout to FunkMaster Flex
And all the DJs across the world
I want to give a shoutout to my nigga Lupe
I want to give a shoutout to my nigga Suge Knight
To my nigga Dr. Dre, Snoop Dogg
I want to give a shoutout to um,um, what's them niggas, Outkast
I want to give a shoutout to them crazy niggas
In parts of the world that I never been too
I want to give a shoutout to the Eskimos
I want to give a shoutout to the submarines
I want to give a shoutout to the army, air force, navy marines
KNow what I'm saying? Y'all playing my music
In the submarines and the boats
Play that shit know what I'm saying?
It's called travelling music busting ya ass style
Yo Big Baby Jesus
It's One Love
I give a shout out to all the women
I give a shout out to all the babies
All the munchkins
All across the world playa, God
I want to give a shoutout to all the school teachers
I give a shout out to um,um, myself

(Chorus)
I give a shout out to the Wu-Tant, Tang, Tang!
The Brooklyn ZooArtist: Ol' Dirty Bastard
Album:  Nigga Please
Song:   Cracker Jack (Bonus Track)
Typed by: Masta10304@hotmail.com

"C'mon baby, c'mon c'mon baby" repeats 
 in background all throughout the song

"You bitches can't do nothin" repeats 
 in background through intro

[Intro: ODB]
It's Ol' Dirty Bastard and shit, knowI'msayin?
I wanna give a big shout out to my nigga Luke
KnowI'msayin? You know, you know, know
I wanna lock all the bitches down
I wanna lock all the bitches down from the North,
to East, to West, to South
KnowI'msayin?
I wanna.. help me put these bitches in my trance
I want y'all to suck my lizard
You bitches wanna fuck me when you smell my under-arm

[ODB]
I make yo' dick disappear
I ain't hearin anymore weird sounds in the ear
PSSSSSSS... you can't purr no more
You wanna kneal and suck dick? I'ma keep your throat sore
Bitches got herpes in ya ass
Every time you fuck a nigga, he dies fast
And you won't last
The pussy break down from a rash
It's hard for you to walk, cuz you stuck up in your ass
Don't ask me for no cash
You better not be tellin me to give them no cash
Ash, bash, crash, sad ass

[Chorus: ODB]
Give me a little of that Cracker Jack
You ain't caramel coated Cracker Jack
The surprise, bitch you gonna get waxed
This that shit, you can't do nothin about

[ODB]
Girls ain't pretty to me anymore
Cuz you ain't bein a real whore
Ooh, you ain't a real whore
*yells some crazy shit*
You can't say, wear nails anymore
You ain't givin up, a manicure
Suckin my dick is gonna be your chore
If you don't, you're punishment
You can't get off until ya suck my dick
Physically I operate your brain to function
Give me anything, that I wantin
ALL GIRLS WANNA FUCK ME EVERYDAY
And give me that, the money
Don't even know what happens naturally
Especially when I'm playin with the chemistry
THE MONEY COMIN TO ME FIRST
You gonna keep dyin til you die from thirst
I WANT A DIFFERENT GIRL EVERYDAY
If you wanna die, you gotta drink my sperm
The other way to die, is eat a can of worms

Chorus 3X

[Outro: ODB]
Give me a little...
Yo, I love you girls cuz you wanna stick your tongue up in my ass
Or you can't taste, smell, touch or hear, or see
I got you in a smash, give me it!

[instrumental for next 58 seconds]Artist: Ol' Dirty Bastard
Album:  Nigga Please
Song:   Dirt Dog
Typed by: dj.flash@pobox.com

[Ol' Dirty Bastard]
C'mon, fuck that shit
{*panting hard seven times*}
Yo bitches out there, a-throw your hands in the air
To my niggaz out there (out there)
Throw your guns in the air (one two three)
Let me hear you go - Dirt, Doooooooog!
	Dirt, Doooooooog!
Let me hear you go - Dirt, Doooooooog!
	Dirt, Doooooooog!
(Ahhhhh) Let me hear you go..
	NO!

Never been branded, no dough shorthanded
This is why the Dirt Dog landed
And I expanded - from the help of the RZA
Shit that NUH commanded
I'm a project hoe, LOVE project hoe
Nigguh get BUST, at the front door
(I do) I don't don't don't, I don't don't
I don't got no love for the pro, the prostitute pro
The Brooklyn Zoo know, I be like Old Joe
*pbbbbbbbbbbt*  See me at the cocaine sto'
Coppin a.. eh ehh ehh.. and coppin mo'
See I'm a real nigga, give a bitch a car
Bitch want a Jeep, give a bitch a star
Bitch wanna sleep, number one..
.. umm, number one, I live in my momma house
Number one, I live in my momma house
This a Ol' Dirty Bastard production, let off SHOTS!
Be hot like I thought from a bitch's twat
I'm just a small boy, well known like Elroy
Well employed
Chest built up like steroids, electra master
Pumpin ten motherfuckers
You can't control the black man's God!!!
Bluh bluh bluh bluh bluh, bluh, better stop
Doo-doo-doo-doo-doo-doo-Dirtiest place to be
You white Flintstone, bitch
You stickin your dick in my gravel pit
Gonna drill the center of the Earth
You white women tryin to swine a bit
I'm the Granddaddy Man from the Senegal clan
Got the bite of a pit, keep your afro simmerin
Nigga GUARD YOUR GROUND!
(GUARD YOUR GROUND!)

Ah-throw your hands in the air
To my niggaz out there, throw ya guns in the air
Let me hear you go Dirt, Doooooooog!
	Dirt, Doooooooog!
Let me hear you go Dirt, Doooooooog!
	Dirt, Doooooooog!
Let me hear you go Dirt, Doooooooog!
	Dirt, Doooooooog!
Let me hear you go Dirt, Doooooooog!
	Dirt, Doooooooog!
Let me hear you go Dirt, Dirt Doooooooog!
(I feel you penetrating through my body)
Dirt, Dirt Doooooooog!
Dirt, Doooooooog!
	Dirt, Doooooooog!
Let me hear you go Dirt, Doooooooog!
	Dirt, Doooooooog!
Let me hear you go..

{*some woman humming la lahhh lahh.. *}

(Oh baby I like it raw..
 Yeah baby I like it RAW..)Artist: Ol' Dirty Bastard f/ Brooklyn Zu, La the Darkman, Rayson
Album:  Nigga Please
Song:   Gettin' High
Typed by: Masta10304@HotMail.Com

[Intro: Rayson, Zu Keeper]
Aiyyo, what's up nigga?
Roll up that shit.
Yo, where you comin' from, nigga?
	The fuck you talkin' 'bout?
	I'm comin' from Franklin.
	Nigga, Brooklyn Zu.
Yo, I got a badge.
You got a badge?
	Nigga, just give me $5.
A'ight. You know I'm sayin', du'?
	Word up.
Now which one of you niggaz really got dough?
	None o' us.
Yo, yo, yo.

[Chorus: Rayson]
We some GQ, get fresh, lamp a lot niggaz
Lettin' all the world know, we be gettin' high
*repeat 3x*

[12 O'Clock]
What's up, nigga? Look how you strong, workin' 'em off
Got that hoe-ass bitch tellin' you you ain't worth it no more
She fuckin' while you on tour, the nigga next door
Y'all even played basketball, should've punched ya in ya jaw
Now nigga need to stay on tour, 10 g's is worth more
She's a chickenhead whore, tryin' to score
I knew a bitch like that before, named Mo'
What a mink in the snow, a rink on the toe
12 O'Clock know, a bitch never want a bitch
Bitch!

[La the Darkman]
Yo 12, this bitch Sky livin' in Bed-stuy
Used to be a hon' until she started gettin' high
The high school prom queen, now she prom fiend
Her man was 85, so he sold her a dream
Told her he was rich, so she sucked his dick
Swallowed all his cum and she didn't even spit
Suckin' him off in the whip, he loved that bitch
He loved that bitch.. he loved that bitch

[Chorus: repeat 3x]

[Shorty Shit Stain]
I know this nigga on the Hill who got mad mils
Some masses, got credit cards, I mean this nigga got big bills
Well, anyway, I'ma sick him
cuz his girl Dawn put me on to the whole ?
She say he don't be home to caress her
So I undressed her and made her feel better
He got the safe in the basement under the cemented floor
So what more, could you ask for?

[Outro: Zu Keeper]
Producer. Representer. RZA. 12 O'Clock.
Rayson. Zu Keeper. Shorty Shit Stain.
Yo... yeah. One time.Artist: Ol' Dirty Bastard f/ Lil' Mo
Album:  Nigga Please
Song:   Good Morning Heartache
Typed by: dj.flash@pobox.com

[ODB]
Ladies and gentlemen, huh
This a song.. that dedicated..
(wee kah boo boo doo doo boo dah boh dah bah dah boh doh goh doh doh..)
.. to me.. (dah boh goh ding.. ah, lalalalalalalah)
MmmmmmmmmmmmmmmmmmmmmmMMmmmmmmmmmmmm..
Doo be doo boo boo be doo boo woo boo BEE booweeoooohhh
Weayeahhhhhhhhhhhgirrrrll

[Lil' Mo]
Whoahhhh-woaAHH-woahhoahhohhh

[ODB] Ah zooby dooby dooby
[Lil] Whoahhoooooohwhoahhhooooooh
[ODB] It's on me girl, to stop fightin and work this out, knahmsayin? F'real

	{*from here out, ODB not in (), Lil' Mo in (), both in []'s}

(Good morning heartache) Good morning heartache, good morning
(You always by my side)
[Good morning heartache] Good morning heartache
[Thought we said goodbye last night]
[I tossed and turned til it seemed] that [you had gone]
[But here you are.. with the dawn] Ooooohooooohhh
[Oooh wish I'd forget you] Wish I'd forget you, proper state of mind
Wish I'd forget you bayyyybe, [but you're here to stay]
Stop thinkin about bein so harsh all the time
[It's seems I met you] Stop bein prejudiced to each other
[when my love had gone away] Stop bein jealous, of one another
[Iaahahahahahhhhhhhhh] ahahahahahhhhhhh
(Start each day out) [just by.. saying to you..] hello
[Good morning heartache, what's new] newwwwwwwwww
[Stop holding me now..] nowwwowowowowwwwwwwwwwwwww
(Can't shake you, no howww) No howwwwwwwwww
(Why don't you) why don't you, why don't you
[leave meeeeee alone] aloneeeeeahhhhhhhhhhIahhhhhh got
(I got those, Monday blues) Monday bluesss
(go straight through) straight through (Sunday blues)
Sunday blueeees
(Oahahaoohhhhhhhhh good morning heartache)
Good morning heartache
(Here we go, here we go, here we go again)
Good morning heartache, oahahhh.. let's go
[Good morning heartache] Good mornin heartache babe
[You're the one, who knew me when..]
(Yes I might as well get used to you)
(Hangin around) Oahhhhhohhh
[Good morning heartache] acheeeeeeeee
[I see you're back in town] towwwwwwwwwn
Oahh *cough cough cough*
(Good morning heartache..)
*cough cough, cough*
[Why don't you just, sit on down]
Hold up
WHYYYYYYY DON'T YOUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUU
[SIT DOWWWOWWWWOWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWN!]Artist: Ol' Dirty Bastard f/ Kelis
Album:  Nigga Please
Song:   Got Your Money
Typed by: m-j-97@msn.com

Ohhh baby
I dedicate this to all the pretty girls
All the pretty girls
Its on (echo)
All the pretty girls, in the world
And the ugly girls too
Cause to me your pretty anyways baby

verse 1:

You give me your number, I call you up
you act like ur pussy dont interrupt
I don't have no problem with you fucking me
But I have a little problem wit you not fucking me
Baby you know ima take care of you
Cause you say you got my baby, and I know it ain't true
Is it a good thing? no its bad bitch
For good or worse, makes you switch
So I walk on over with my crystal
Bitches, niggaz put away your pistols
Dirty wont be having it in this house
Cause bitch I'll cripple your style
Now that you heard my calm voice
You couldn't get another nigga, hoochie wont get moist
If you wana look good and not be bummy, girl you better give me that money
Aooow...

hook: Kelis

Hey, dirty, baby I got your money
Don't your worry, I said hey.
Baby I got your money
X2

verse2:

Yo! so I glanced at the girls, girls glanced at me
I whispered in their ear, wana be with me?
You wana look pretty though, in my video
Ol' dirty on the hat and I let you all know
Just dance! if you caught up in the holy ghost trance
If you stop! ima put the killer ants in your pants
I'm the O-D-B as you can see
Every eye, don't you be watching me
I don't want no problems cause I put you down
In the ground where you can not be found
I'm just dirt dog trying to make sum bunny
So give me my streaks and give me my honey
Radio, yes all day, everyday
Recognize I'm a fool and ya luuuuuuuuuuv me!
None of you nmph better look at me funny
Nmph you know my name now give me my money!

hook X2
Dirty: sing it, sing it girls! (during hook)
Just shake it right now!
Somebody else: if dirty want his money
I think ya'll should give him his money
Dirty: that's how I like giiiiiiiirlllll

Sexy, sexy, sexy!
Sexy, sexy, sexy!

Sexy, sexy, sexy!
Sexy, sexy, sexy!

verse3:

Yo, yo!
Nigga playing in the club like this all night
Bitches put your ass out let me hold it tight
You looking at my wrist saying "its so nice"
The price bitch is diamonds shining disco light
You better help me solve this problem
Or ima get this money and rob them
Lucky dig when I won the lotto
Ran up on my car for carrying (ryllos?)
You can call me dirty, and then lift up your skirt
And you want some of this dirty, god made dirt and dirt bust yo ass
Stop annoying me, yeah! I play my music loud
It takes the bastard ol' dirty, to move the crowd
They say he had his dick in his mouth
Eddie Murphy told me that back in the house
But give me my money!

hook till fade with odb sayin shitArtist: Ol' Dirty Bastard
Album:  Nigga Please
Song:   Nigga Please
Typed by: flabbo@hotmail.com

(ODB)
I ain't no nigga

My words can't be held against me
I'm not caught up in your law

All music must obey me
All pain must obey me
I cripple my enemies
Got that careful vocabulary
I can talk my way up out of anything
Nobody's words can go against me
I'm stingy, I want all that energy
Osirus, the best nigga in the place to be
I two hundred hot degree
Burning ya til you faint y'all
Y'all niggas shooting blanks y'all
I'm fucking my vest, drive an armored tank y'all
I dead niggas like a dog buries a bone
You could never set me up I raise the pain volume
Nominate me, as presidential MC
My career so intelligent unique physique
A nigga please!

(ODB and RZA)
(Chorus)
You could never fuck with the dog,
A nigga please!
Nigga I will bury ya bone
A nigga please!
I'm the one who burned ya home
A nigga please!

Watch your shit fall like Rome
I'm immune to all viruses
I get the cocaine it cleans out my sinuses
Just for slinging *nuh* I get a quarter a mil
I'll have it raining ice drops the size of automobiles
Kill all the government microchips in my body
I'm the paranoid nigga at your party
I kill all my enemies at birth!
Shut the fuck up!
Bitch and let my slide my hands up your skirt
Nigga please!

Chorus

Nigga please!(You could never fuck with the dog)(x5)

(RZA)
Straight up! ODB type shit
Y'all watch out for the Abbott and Crazy Monk
Coming soon
Splashed y'all with the organic hip-hop spazola type
Naw mean
Straight up!
For born in onArtist: Ol Dirty Bastard
Album:  Nigga Please
Song:   I Want Pussy
Typed by: curtmott@hotmail.com

Stink hos (repeat 6X)

I want pussy for free, I want pussy for free
You can not have my money
I want pussy for free, look, I want pussy for free
I want pussy for free, I want pussy for free (for freeeeeeeee)

I ain't givin none of y'all girls money shit fuck y'all
Love ya but fuck ya let bounce this ball
Screwface ya bitches put food on y'all
He won't slip, won't trip, won't ever fall
Bitch you better obey me, better not betray me
Callin the cops sayin this is his baby

Pussy for free, baby, I don’t want none of yall havin my money
I want pussy

Yeah my momma can not protect y'all
Yeah my momma can not protect y'all
Yeah my momma can not protect y'all
Right, Right
Yeah my momma can not protect y'all
Yeah my momma can not protect y'all
Right Right
Yeah my momma can not protect y'all
My momma can not protect y'all
My momma can not protect y'all
My momma can not protect y'all
Bitch and I ain't gonna protect y'all bitch
Alright? YeahArtist: Ol' Dirty Bastard f/ Chris Rock, The Neptunes, Zu Keeper
Album:  Nigga Please
Song:   Recognize
Typed by: Masta10304@hotmail.com

[Chris Rock]
Yo, yo, this is Chris Rock
You heard my man
He ain't on no commercial shit
The O.D.B.
It ain't the Young D.B.
It's the Ol' D.B.
That old shit
This ain't the Embry-O D.B.
This is the Ol' mothafuckin D.B.
I'm Chris Rock, I'm chillin with the O.D.B.
So I'm the wrong place, at the wrong mothafuckin time
with the wrong mothafuckin man
The O.D.B., baby

[Ol' Dirty Bastard]
All y'all niggas talkin bout commercial song
This ain't no commercial song
Straight up, nigga, what?
Y'all niggas can't fuck with me
All y'all niggas lovin me

[The Neptunes]
Mister courageous O.D.B.
You need to recognize he's a P-I-M-P
You need to recognize

[Ol' Dirty Bastard (Neptunes)]
Yo, what's my name? (You need to recognize)
Shut the fuck up! (You need to recognize)
I bring the mothafuckin ruckus
(You need to recognize) C'mon punk ass niggas
Uh, nah, nah, I'm just fuckin wit'chall
(Uh-huh)

[Ol' Dirty Bastard (Zu Keeper)]
Who get drunk at night till the early morn'?
Tap dances at the party like it's goin on
Bitches and niggas all around scopin eachother down
I'm takin pictures at y'all at the fuckin lounge
Mad niggas was, gettin drunk at the bar
I'm throwin Moet bottles, HA HA HA HA HA HA
It's rowdy outside, I ain't signin shit
Don't flow bitch, I take your microphone
You party bitches fallin in line
with your fat ass stinkin behind
You don't know who the fuck is here
I back smack your ass, make pressure appear
Cuz cold Lucky knockin at your door
I dedicate that to your source
Cuz this (Nigga please) is dirty and it's stinkin
Funkier than (Peppi Le Pew, so I was thinkin)
I drop you mothafuckin niggas on the (weekend)
(Lettin you know that) bitch nigga don't start
You thought that I was weak? Huh, let me speak
My rhymes come funkier than your grandfather's feet
So listen mister, don't you ever forget
Rhyme dirty, you couldn't even clean it with Comet
or even Worex, some tried Ajax
Only mix wit, the back get this track

Y'all niggas can't fuck with me
All y'all niggas lovin me

[The Neptunes]
Mister courageous O.D.B.
You need to recognize he's a P-I-M-P
You need to recognize, you need to recognize
You need to recognize, niggas need to recognize
Uh-huh, uh-huh
Uh-huh, uh-huh

[Ol' Dirty Bastard (Zu Keeper)]
Sweet girl, sweet girl
Each and every day-a, each and every way-a
See you niggas, most of your strayers
Stray off from a thing, civilization-a
Don't understand the true nation-a
Go back like cold ovens and ice boxes
(Murder Avenue L trains, Broadway blackouts
Brooklyn Zu keep history, fam shake the trends
Five years of workin bodies, voice box hits the shotty
I move in parties, stickin hotties
And all you fake mob Gotti's, I push your skirt up
My shit's so bad I wipe my ass with a burner)

I said, y'all niggas can't fuck with me
All y'all niggas lovin me

[The Neptunes]
Mister courageous O.D.B.
You need to recognize he's a P-I-M-P
You need to recognize, you need to recognize
You niggas need to recognize, uh-huh, uh-huh

[Ol' Dirty Bastard]
Y'all niggas can't fuck with me
All y'all niggas lovin me

[The Neptunes]
Mister courageous O.D.B.
You need to recognize he's a P-I-M-P
You need to recognize, you need to recognize
Bitches and niggas'll recognize
Look, uh-huh, uh-huh, uh-huh
Uh-huh, uh-huh, uh-huhArtist: Ol' Dirty Bastard
Album:  Nigga Please
Song:   Rollin Wit You
Typed by: flabbo@hotmail.com

You can't imitate me on this fuckin tape
You ain't ringing the bell I'm ready when you are

[You ain't ringing the bell
You ain't busting the grape
You ain't imitating me on this fuckin tape] (x10)

I'm tellin you bitch ass niggas
If y'all don't fuckin
If y'all coloured bitch ass faggot punk ass motherfuckers
Don't see that these white people are trying to take over your shit
Don't worry, your baby's happy the Ol' Dirty Bastard is here
Your baby happy I'm here
To beat the shit out of all you faggot punk ass motherfuckers
Bitch ass niggas!

I shut whole fuckin' world down
You white motherfuckers could never, ever take over
You can't ever take over!(x2)
You shut the fuck up and you shut the fuck up
That's what the fuck you do!
(Could I get a beer, yo I need some beer)

You ain't using your phone, you ain't callin the cops
Cause nigga I'm the only king of the block
I'm the only black god, motherfucker!
And I came to rock the spot
When I throw at football pass at a bitch she miss
Ain't trying to be funny gonna use my fist
You can't use the family feud
You can't run it on a cuckoooo!!!!
You bring shame, I'll keep Ol' Dirty safe
Not locked up, cause I'll have your fuckin ass locked up!
I'll stash you, lickin you down, light that blunt!
You ain't gettin one,two I do what I want!
If I got a problem, a problems got a problem til it's gone
I'm the only Unique Ason
You reap what you sew
Fuckin with the O
I got the precinct locked down
You ain't using the po-po
Fuck you Soso
I got the keys to your hoe
I'll stop your whole flow, all you bitches roll
Would be from the ghetto
You want me to control
This fuckin' show
Give Ol' Dirty what he want and mo!
Time stops you'll go
Mafia slow!
Time'll stop you'll go
Mafia! Pay me all my motherfucking money
Or I'ma slow down your dough!

(Chorus)
Jesus I'm rollin with you(x4)

You'll all be in danger
You'll have a sex changer
I'm gettin more anger call me Dr. Stranger
I master the demon demonic toys
Sting you with the venom kill your joy!
Bitches throw hands in the air like to be sodomized
That's what I'm here for!
That's what I'm all about!
I get girls and I'll they want to give is a good fuck from me
Oh BABY!!
Hippa to the hoppa and you just don't stoppa
I control Michael Jackson's Thriller
Catch him and ruuhhahaha
Fuck with the guys that'll make you shrug
I'm the only original
Fuck you chump!
Shut the fuck up!

Yo did you understand that?

ChorusArtist: Ol' Dirty Bastard
Album:  Nigga Please
Song:   All in Together Now
Typed by: dj.flash@pobox.com

[Ol' Dirty Bastard]
Yeah youknowhatI'msayin?  It's all I'm sayin
Knahmsayin?  Yo I'ma tell all y'all motherfuckers somethin,
knahmsayin?  I'm a Dalmation, knahmsayin?
Motherfucker I'm white AND I'm black, what?
You can't understand it?  Then FUCK YOU!  Knahmsayin?
I love this
Motherfucker, I need this
We work from hand to hand, from country to town,
from city to state, from world to world; nigga
From universe to universe
It's a white and black thing (all the world leaders)
It's all, and together (I said peace, and love, from happiness)
You understand meeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeee??!!

??, turn me up!
Ah turn me up! (7X)

{keep repeating "Ah turn me up!" in the background}
	White girls shake your ass
	Black girls shake your ass
	Everybody shake your ass
	C'mon, shake yo' ass!!

Turn me up!  Motherfuckers gettin hot in here
Niggaz all gettin hot in here
Everybody gettin hot in here
Whitey's gettin hot in here
Blackie's gettin hot in here
Somebody gettin hot in here
Everybody gettin hot in here
Red people gettin hot in here
Yellow people gettin hot in here
Blue people gettin hot in here
Aliens gettin hot in here
Somebody gettin hot in here
White people gettin hot in here
Black people gettin hot in here
Everybody gettin hot in heeeeereeeeeahhhhh

The chamber of this banger, is 36th chamber
Understand Equality Slang, that of Allah's name
Played the rabbit, like you dead
Mork from Ork, first take support see me in The Source
Yo I take the Eighty-Five Percent brain
Cause Black makes what makes rain
Dirty brain is like payday to me
GOD, Unique baby
Who's the Five Percent of the planet Earth?
Tell em Poppa Wu, well it sure ain't Poppa Smurf!
Got to check your blood, take you to church
Ministers down with the nerds
Ever since birth, 
white man always tryin to take the black man's turf
Black man built America
I named ya after Asia, you ain't my MOMMA!
Now her name is Erika, Bo Derek-ah
What, you like that slave name?
It wasn't 'posed to sound better
New Rule order, New Rule order
For ALL the maniacs in jail read this letter
Be behind me when I'm makin this cheddar
Cause I'ma make it more better, for our babies
Cause they play in the same schoolyards everyday
C'mon, c'mon, c'mon, c'mon, c'mon!

You've, got, that WHITE WHITE WHITE WHITE
white man clock on your wall
I'm tired of gettin up goin to work
for that WHITE WHITE WHITE WHITE man y'all
I's got a bad boss
These thoughts was fuckin Diana Ross
I ain't no ??, makin this money
NUH!  Show yourself
Whitey come on, get the money (GET THE MONEY)
My Father Allah walk with Gods
Just like the dollar bill walk with God We Trust
And I walk this dog, two-thousand two-hundred miles for you
whaaaaaaaaat?  Let the ?? know it's done
Hey blackie, yo whitey

It's all, all, all in together now
We gettin paid gettin dressed for the weather now
All, all, all in together now
We gettin paid gettin dressed for the weather now
All, all in together now
Gettin paid gettin dressed for the weather now
Alllllll in together now
We're gettin paid gettin dressed for the weather now
Peace!

It's all in together now
New World Order baby, knahmsayin?
Y'all recognize it's together
You understand me?  It's the Dirt Dog speakin
My word is BOND, and my bond is life
It's all in together now my niggaz, and my niggarettes
My peoples, don't worry about it
It's all slang from the same gang
I'm black out, and I'm black in
I'm white out, and I'm white in
SO WHAT?!?!?!Artist: Ol' Dirty Bastard
Album:  Nigga Please
Song:   You Don't Want to Fuck With Me
Typed by: supafly@metro.net

Yo, when I say you don't want to fuck with me 
I'm not talking to you girl (and woman)
Yo, 'cause y'all want to fuck... y'all want to fuck me

Verse:
I stay away from danger, danger stay away from me
I kind of react on y'all niggas and then I flee
Whatever you say is a mirage
And on top of that, huh, nigga fuck y'all
I'm the law of the land, got girls Uncle Nuggah
I gagagaga got girls on the command
I got the government lost on Gilligan Island (Nigga Please!)
By December, CIA gettin' paid taxes back 
>From the Candy Cane, Santa came, back in the big hurricane
You ain't shaggy anymore D8, I ain't in your ballgame
I became, ain't your doggy bag ho same
You gotta make Ol' Dirty a better man 
In the world if you wanna live
Fuck y'all, God don't forgive
I don't answer phones
I'll never reveal the Wu-Tang secret, and if you don't believe 
I'll kill your shit

Chorus: 2x
You don't want
You don't want fuck with me ('Cause my name is Ol' Dirty)

Verse:
Please Nigga!
You couldn't jump jump jump
You couldn't punk, you couldn't funk funk funk the shit up
My name is Dirt Dog the 18
Millimeter, shoot you up, bust you up (Fuck fuck, What?)
I drop an ambulance on a nigga
Mad trucks, runnin' over niggas
I love bitches, when they front on they pussycat
You ain't gettin' over like a fat rat
Hate is the method, killin' all you savages
You won't be sendin' me messages
I put your nigga on pause, I keep that shit on
Destroy you through your whores
'Cause you ain't never had clout
You niggas on a rat drought
I never get tired, I ain't in your drama quote
Suck my dick!

Chorus: 6x
(To the ugly girls, throw your hands in the fuckin' air!)
(To the ugly bitches, wave 'em like you just don't care!)

Verse:
Yo, I'm the cunt breath asshole eater
And if you let me physically eat it, it only get (burps)
Yo, the race we'll lose
I'm ??? the booze
Don't eat the food!
AAAAHH! If you really want to cum
This dope game get your pussy numb
YO! FUCK Y'ALL! EVERYBODY!

Chorus: 3x
Don't ever look at my name as badArtist: Ol Dirty Bastard
Album:  Return to the 36 Chambers: The Dirty Version
Song:   Baby C'mon
Typed by: dj.flash@pobox.com

Yo, are you taping baby?
Baby are you taping?
Ohh yeahhahhahheeyahhhyahhhhohhhyahhhh
Baby baby c'mon, baby c'mon, baby c'mon
What the fuck anybody wanna do?
Right motherfucking now!
Ahhahhahhhah

Verse One:

I'm the dog who's ahead of the Lords
Dirty Bastard from the Wu-Tang squad
Can I get raw, yes I get Dirty to the floor
Rhymes, hittin on your mind, you could never ignore
Hip-hop to me is like a place to be
My specialTY from me to you is emCEE
Say what you wanna sayyyahhh, baby sayahh
I flip the microphone-ah, any dayahh
I'm mad swift because I got that gift of gab
Niggaz get mad, your ass stink never had
this talent that I got will resound the spot
MC's, you got paid a lot
You ever notice a black man damn mostly slams
When it come to the money yo it ain't funny
It's what you gotta do what you got to do
C'mon, can I get a Wu-Tang
Wu, Tang, Wu, Tang, Wu, Tang, Wu, Tang
Wu, Tang, Wu, Tang, Wu, Tang, it's on your brain
I get riggy diggy raw when it's time to get
on the dancefloor shotgun kill the shit
BLAOW, then you won't step to me
Thinking is he really raw as he said he'd be
If I wasn't really raw, standing here on the floor
You'd be like BOOOOO HE AIN'T NO HARDCORE
Niggaz play like they live but won't survive
Jumpin up and down ticklin that jive when you ticklin gab
I'm an average man, G-O-D fan
Let it be known who's the champ, Wu-Tang Clan!
It's coming through and WU, boy it's bad too!
Throw your hands in the air, if you don't care
WHO, the Ol Dirty Bastard be
oh me on my, you be hoppin on my shit just like a fly
BZZZZZT, all around
The dirtiest stinkin sound down to the ground
What what, what you wanna do?
What you wanna do when I'm coming for you?
I'm gonna give it to ya, bayyybah, bayybah,
bayybahhhahahahahahahahahahah...
Artist: Ol Dirty Bastard f/ Ghostface Killer
Album:  Return to the 36 Chambers - The Dirty Version
Song:   Brooklyn Zoo II
Typed by: dj.flash@pobox.com

Intro:

One two, one two -- you taping this?
All types of shit yo let that shit ride
Word to mother, turn up the microphone!
Get all that good shit, get all that good shit [one two, one two]
One two, one two, one two... one two
Now niggaz know
Ssssshhhit, yo yo check this out, check this joint
This is strictly for the radio, yo
I just want all y'all to know
The reason why I curse is because my momma and my daddy
They grew up cursin
So please respect my style, please!

Verse One: Ol Dirty Bastard

I'll grab the mic and now I damage you, cut your whole stamin-u
Ohh, sssshit, nahh
I'll grab the mic and now I damage ya, cut your whole staminuh
Here comes the medical examinuh
One verse then you out for the count
Bring the ammonia make sure he sniffs... the right amount
Ya yo, I'm sorry, un-gah-e-gas-e-ya

I'll grab and the mic and now I damage you, cut your whole stamiNUH
Here comes the medical examiNUH
One verse then you're out for the count
Bring the ammonia, make sure he sniffs the right amount
Wake you up and then I ask you
How do you intend this --
competition to get an asssss kickin sooooo tremendous, RARRH!
You shouldn't bother this
Leave me alone like a son he'll be fatherless!
I got the asiatic flow mixed with disco
Roll up on the scene like the Count of Monte Crisco
and MC's start to vanish
I rolled up on a jet black kid the nigga started speakin spanish
Yo!  You wasn't from Panana!!
I asked you how you get so fuckin dark, you said suntama
He responded so fast, you made me laugh
Ha-ha-ha, HARARRRH scared-his ass!
Kick the hundred strongest rhymes 
then I brought out the punk in him
Roll up with the strong five deadly venoms
Told HIM!  Enter the Wu-Tang!
Witness the Shaolin slang, that crush any shit you bring
I watch your ass take a big fall, why?!
My Main Source, is like a friendly game of stickball
And as you step up to bat man, I play the riddler
You try to do me for my nigga I'll change to Hitler
I'll go out like Nazi, wish your fuckin ass stayed
home and play Yahtzee!
Or watchin Happy Days sweatin Poxie
with Ralphie and Cunningham, Joni and Chachi

[Yo Unique, yo kid
 Check this shit out! Yo, yo]

Verse Two: Ghostface Killer

Ninety-five niggaz is wasted
Keystone capered, and Wu kept the rap fiends basted
Foamin out the mouthpiece, heads blown like geese
Murderous police, I do shows and perform in Grease
It's not magic, gaming is the gadget
World classic big national high attracts dear graphics
Lampin in my own zone, my physical show
Inhale bones Tony stuck, for the diamond in Rome
He's convincin, labelled one man rap convention
The nigga that'll gun down, eighty frenchmen
Lead vocalist, music specialist, rap arsonist
I deal with sharpness plus spark the hardest individual
I plant crimes inside vocals
My rap's like my passport, my life's my proof
Hit the sun roof, be out like a wanderin dream
Shuttle, and get startled off the verbal hygiene, my nigga

[sample of Stamina]
[sample of Baby C'mon]
[sample of Brooklyn Zoo]
[sample of Drunk Game (Sweet Sugar Pie]
[sample of The Stomp]

Shame on you when you step through to
Ol Dirty Bastard, Brooklyn Zoo!
Shame on you when you step through to
Ol Dirty Bastard, Brooklyn Zoo!
What?!! My nuh
Shame on you when you step through to
The Ol Dirty Bastard, Brooklyn Zoo
Shame on you when you step through to
THe Ol Dirty Bastard, Brooklyn Zoo
To the West coast!
To the East coast
To the North coast
To the South
When you take North, East, West, South
Put it all together and it spell NEWS!
Then you got the ol rhythm, bastard blues
and ya don't stop
So keep your shit, motherfucker, fucker, fucker!

[live concert]Artist: Ol' Dirty Bastard
Album:  Return to the 36 Chambers: The Dirty Version
Song:   Brooklyn Zoo
Typed by: dj.flash@pobox.com

[Ol' Dirty Bastard]
Word up, I bust that nigga ass right now!
Ain't none of them niggaz can't fuck with me!
What? Nigga you could never fuck with me, my nigga!
(Ol' Dirty!) I'll fuck you up right now! What? What? What?
Bust your motherfuckin ass boy! I ain't no motherfuckin joke
You know who you talkin to?
(Word up, bust that nigga ass, word up)
Ol' Dirty Bastard y'knahmsayin? I'll fuck you up right now!
Yeah, what? What? (Get that nigga yo!
He ain't sayin nothin, fuck him!)

I'm the one-man army, Ason
I've never been tooken out, I keep MC's lookin out
I drop science like girls be droppin babies
Enough to make a nigga go cra-a-azy
Energy buildin, takin all types of medicines
Your ass thought you were better than
Ason, I keep planets in orbit
While I be comin with teeth, bitin more shit
Enough to make ya break and shake ya ass
cause I create, rhymes good as a Tasty Cake, mix
This style, I'm mastered in
Niggas catchin headaches, what? What? You need aspirin?
This type of pain, you couldn't even kill with Midol
Fuck around get sprayed with Lysol
In your face like a can of mace, baby
Is it burnin? Well fuck it, now you're learnin
how, I don't even like your motherfuckin profile
Give me my fuckin shit, CH-CH-BLAOW!
Not seen and heard, no one knows
You forget, niggaz be quiet as kept
Now you know nothin; before you knew a whole fuckin lot
Your ass don't wanna get shot!
A lot of MC's came to my showdown
To watch me put your fuckin ass lo-o-ow down
As you can go, below zero
without a doubt I've never been tooken out
by a nigga, who couldn't figure
Yo by a nigga, who couldn't figure
Yo by a nigga, who couldn't figure (Brooklyn Zoo)
how to pull a fuckin gun trigger
I said, "Get the fuck outta here!"
Nigga wanna get too close, to the utmost
But I got stacks that'll attack any wack host
Introducin, yo FUCK that nigga's name!
My hip-hop drops on your head like ra-a-ain
And when it rains it pours, cause my rhymes hardcore
That's why I give you more of the raw
Talent that I got will riz-ock the spot
MC's I'll be bur-r-rnin, bur-r-rnin hot
Whoa-hoa-hoa! Let me like slow up with the flow
If I move too quick, oh, you just won't know
I'm homicidal when you enter the target
Nigga get up, act like a pig tryin to hog shit!
So I take yo ass out quick
The mics, I've had it my nigga, you can suck my dick
If you wanna step to my motherfuckin rep'
CH-CH-BLAOW! BLAOW! BLAOW! Blown to death
You got shot cause you knock knock knock
"Who's there?" Another motherfuckin hardrock
Slackin on your mackin 'cause raw's what you lack
You wanna react? Bring it on back...

[Chorus (5x): Ol' Dirty Bastard]
Shame on you, when you step through to
the Ol' Dirty Bastard, Brooklyn Zoo!

[Outro: Ol' Dirty Bastard]
What?  My nigga...

Shame on ya...Artist: Ol' Dirty Bastard (featuring the Rza)
Album:  Return to the 36 Chambers - The Dirty Version
Song:   Cuttin' Headz
Typed by: OHHLA.com

Here it is
Where's it at?
In the back
Got a stack
The Dirty Bastard
Yo you Bastard flip the phat track
Here I go, here I go, whether friend whether foe
Let them know that I flow over the rainbow
Hit the deck
Aw, yep, (ch-ch plow) from the Tek, takin heads, takin necks
What the fuck they expect?
I don't know
I don't care
I won't fall
I won't stare at a ho, less I know that I'm going to the mo-
T-t-tel, cause I'm lousy, technique is drowsy
Stop tryin to foul me
Sayin that we're lousy
But I'm a tyrant, defiant, walkin New York Giant
President of the Wu
But I'm also a client
It's the Wu, what, you knew what, you do what, what, who, what, what
I don't give a flying fuck
About a chump, cause this heart only pumps Kool-Aid
Snatch a kid by the braids, and cut his head off

Rhymes is rugged like burnt buildings in Harlem
The Ol Dirty Bastard from the Temple of Shaolin
Dirty to the brain like drops of acid rain
Clang, clang, clang, rhymes pluckin at your brain
So take a sip from the cup of death
And when you're shaking my right hand, I'll stab you with the left
(Whirr whirr whirrr!) Red alert! Red alert!
Ason comin straight from the dirt
Once I go berzerk, mad brothers got hurt
Nuthin new in ninety-two
It's time to do the work
Trails of vatos scream once I hop on the scene
And fear the return of the fatal flying guillotine
Mr. Milli, that means I'm also militant
Don't wear no suit and tie, I'm no gentleman
Gettin laid, takin heads, that's my hobby
Punch a brother in the face who call me Robbie
I be the RZA, call me that cuz-I
Never liked the name I recieved from my poppa
Dirty deluxe, yo, I'm huntin for ducks
Snatchin devils up by the hair, then cut his head off

Artist: Ol Dirty Bastard f/ The Genius
Album:  Return to the 36 Chambers - The Dirty Version
Song:   Damage
Typed by: dj.flash@pobox.com

Intro:

Peace [peace!]
[Dirty, Ol Dirty Bastard]
[The Genius! Genius]
The Genius [The Genius, the Genius]

Verse One: Ol Dirty Bastard [GZA in brackets]

I'll grab and the mic and now I damage you, cut your whole stamina
Here comes the medical examiner
One verse then you're out for the count
[Bring the ammonia] make sure he sniffs the right amount
Wake him up and then I ask him
Why did he intend this --
competition to get an ass kickin so tremendous
Boy you shouldn't bother this
Leave me alone like the [son said G or he'll be fatherless!]
I got the asiatic flow mixed with disco
Roll up on the scene like the Count of Monte Crisco
and MC's start to vanish
[I stepped up to a jet black kid, started speakin spanish!
 Yo he wasn't from Panama
 I asked him how he get so dark, the nigga said suntama!
 He responded so fast, you made me laugh]
Ha-ha-ha, HARARRRH [then I scared-his ass!]
[Kick the hundred strongest rhymes 
 I brought out the punk in him
 Caught him with a strong five deadly venom
 Told him enter the Wu-Tang
 Witness the Shaolin slang, that'll crush the shit you bring]
I watch your ass take a big fall, why?!
My Main Source, is like a friendly game of stickball
And as you step up to bat man [I play the riddler]
You try to do me for a rhyme [then I'll change to Hitler]
Go out like Nazi; you'll be wishin your fuckin ass stayed
home and played [Yahtzee!]
Or watchin Happy Days sweatin [Poxie]
with Ralphie and Richie Cunningham, Joni and [Chachi]
Wu, who? Me gettin wreck so I'm through
Like a ten and a half foot, gettin in a seven [shoe]
[Now picture THAT with a Minolta]
Have your ass doin some Night Fever shit like John Travolta
I come strong I make knowledge born, I flip the script
and rock on from P.M. [past the fucking Dawn]
Pass the Hammer you're broke down, niggaz grab my what what
Can't understand it here's the panaroma
[A complete view of how I defeat you]
Should of stepped to those fuckin kids who tried to [beat you]
Yeah I bust that ass before
[You ran to Texas and came back but forgot the chainsaw!]
And want to perform a massacre
Better be coming with some motherfucking shit that's spectacular
Crush the person who did em, well you just better
So I'm stepping to your [raggedy ass jetta]
Put the pedal to the metal
You and your DJ change your name to Ma and Pa Kettle
as I [pass the bone, kicks your every measure]
It's not a Newport but it's still live with pleasure
[C'mon don't be silly, just a bag of sensimilli
 Rolled up in a] Motown Philly
[I used to write all the time when I smoked
 Grab the mic, then I kinda like went for broke
 With visually concepts strongest rhymes and biceps
 Lyrically speakin, three to four rhymes then choke
 Some think they be harmin this, claimin they be bombin this]
But they still remains a-nom-ynous
I pull strings like Jimi Hendrix
Ride more beats that go backs to the days of Eddie Kendricks
I teach the truth to the youth, I say [hey youth]
Here's the truth, better start wearing [bullet proof]
Arm yourself with a shield
[Before you get trapped up] just like the Children in the CornfieldArtist: Ol Dirty Bastard w/ Method Man
Album:  Return to the 36 Chambers - the Dirty Version
Song:   Dirty Dancin *
Typed by: dj.flash@pobox.com

* - originally appeared on the Jerky Boys soundtrack, bonus cut on CD
* - was originally listed as a Wu-Tang Clan song

(Ol Dirty Bastard is doing a Martin Lawrence comedy skit from Raw)
(this is going on in the background during the Intro and part
 of the first verse)

You know God damn well I don't smoke this shit Meth
*coughing* Know damn well I don't smoke this sheyit
Know damn well!
I remember when we used to go down to the creek
Member when we used to go down to the creek?
And used to dip your head in the water?
Everybody thought you had it in you, you know
You used to jump out the water
the water used to glisten alllllll over your bohhhhhhdy
What?  I said the water used to glisten alllllll over your bohhhhhhdy

Intro: Ol Dirty Bastard

Clean out my vocals
Yeah, I said YEAH
I said zuckazuhzuhzuh, zuckazuhzuh
*more nonsense noises*
chkccha ckchcka Brooklyn, zucka Zoo
C'mon baby baby, baby, baby
Baby, baby, baby, c'mon!

Verse One:

Superlogical this, superlogical that
I detect a nigga dialect by the way he rap
I elect myself President MC
My career so intelligent, unique physique
Then with mathematics, not democratic
static, topic, Asiatic
Zssshuh, them unique, never leak, brlaharl...
Bring it on back

Superlogical this, superlogical that
I detect your dialect by the way you rappp!
I elect myself President MC
My career so intelligent, unique physique
Doin mathematics and I'm not democratci
No static, topic, I'm Asiatic
See, I'm Unique, never... blarhalal...

Verse Two: Method Man, Ol Dirty Bastard

Crazy, lurkin in the shadows, I'm shady, sheisty
Get your weight up, don't take me lightly
Blasted, dirty to the grain I be stained with the madness
It's the Meth-Tical with the Bastard

MZA MZA my name is the Ol Dirty Bas
My gammmmme, to kick your ass
Dnnah duh dnnh dnnh duh duh!
Dnnah dnh duh duh duh dahhhhhh!

Flip and relax, take an Ex-Lax, I'm shittin
on the industry that was frontin now they missin
What everybody else is gettin
Cuz they wasn't representin the real...

...appeal, like me and, old time
When it comes to the microphone who killed the swine?
Be the original G
Do the rhymin on time and in the place to be

Interlude: Old Dirty Bastard, Method Man

You are now in my trance
  You are getting sleeeeeepyyyyyy
You are now getting sleeeepyyyyy
  and sleeeeppieeerrrrr
And sleepy, and sleepy

Verse Three: Method Man

This one here's for my people, my people
Enter the 36 chambers, the sequel
Part two, for me and the cipher troop
With the Teflon lyrics that you can't get through
With the twenty-two automatic rap you pack, what?
You ain't hittin with that wack shit you kickin
Straight from the beginning, of the game
All the way to the ninth inning, I bring the pain
Dark like the midnight train on the track by the RZA
Diesel like Arnold Schwarzanegger

Outro: Ol Dirty Bastard

The hardware, choose the hardware
Ask you a question, test the Ason
Extra extra, read the drama and thennn another one
which you intrigue, do your rap fatigue in the...
ohhhh....
Here I go, aauhhh
Yeahhh... 
(shit that makes me high) *2

*2 - leads into Harlem World on the album version
Artist: Ol Dirty Bastard w/ Killah Priest
Album:  Return to the 36 Chambers: The Dirty Version
Song:   Don't U Know
Typed by: dj.flash@pobox.com

Girl 1: Oh cutie got it goin' ON!
Girl 2: Cute? What? That dirty motherfucker?
Girl 1: You buggin'!
Girl 2: Ain't no buggin', he's some ugly motherfucker.
Girl 1: You buggin', no -- look at his disposition, shorty gotta stride!
Girl 2: What stride? Ugly motherfucker, he ain't shit.
Girl 1: See, that's my plate, brother may kill me like that.
Girl 2: You got mad sour flavor on shorty, cuz that ain't shit at all...
Girl 1: I'm -- yo G, I don't think he realizes it. Look at him!
Girl 2: Look at what? Dirty motherfucker, he ain't shit.
Girl 1: Hahaha, you don't see what I see, B.
Girl 2: I don't see nothing, you ain't blind, sisso.
Girl 1: True, true. Just look at him, just look at his disposition!

Verse One: Ol Dirty Bastard

Approach the school nine thirty, you're late
This time happy the solution was my date.
Get in your class, walk to your chair
pop is all you see and then occasionally stare
At the teacher, more, tune in to we're clocking ya.
Lean back at this girl kept clockin' ya hood
Simulated from a [sensimilia] blonde,
tell the young girl "Baby, you're the one I want."
She doesn't respond, pretends to ignore
so you say to yourself, it be her old and sore mentally
pitchin' lies, the aim on the board as hot and wild pussy
you cannot afford this
Oooh, what slim and trim was my inner friend
Dear, quietly I want him to know my boots,
to rap out loose in my class,
but I kept sayin' the size of my dick and that ass.
So I turned around to arrange a date.
Swinging episode, baby number one's gotta say it
She popped a gum, cold twist to come
I said "Baby, how you feel?"
She said "Sure"
Then I said "sure", I just found my thrill
wear it in the classroom, know I'm Blueberry Hill
Cause what I said just bottled her hate.
She put her face on the chest, this is what the bitch said:
"Because of you I aint hurting, but then my within my heart
 Cause no, I'm not right to be flirtin, but our relationship has to start.
 You're the one that I'm clocking, stop or you could stop mockin'
 Don't want you to see me cry, this is why, this is why, this is why!"

Verse Two: Killah Priest

I met a girl named Chandra, from way down yonder
The apple of my eye had a Snapple and some fries
Forgot the catsup, thats when I pressed up
"I've been watching you mowing your lawn"
The thoughts were flowin, while I'm holding the palm
"Hey whats that on your menu?", from there we continued
And talk about this and that we chit and chat
Sipped on the Coke then I stroked the back
As she giggled and I wiggled to the bra
She said "nah!", that's when I noticed her pah
Big Tank, who did nothing but the spank
at parties, drink Bacardi and didn't think
Just act silly, with his brother Willy
another hillbilly gettin ill with the Philly
and moonshine, but it's a new time of day
on the stoop doing the Patty Duke
OK, it's like that old flip flaps through the shower caps
The platform shoes to Apple Jacks
Chub chub!!

Interlude: Ol Dirty Bastard

Yo, you niggaz, niggaz be actin like
they be lovin them, them them fancy bitches
I, I likes me a nasty bitch
Bitch that's willing to do anything at any given time
Bitch gotta be nasty cuz I'm a nasty nigga
I do anything baby, I wouldn't give a fuck what it was
I'll, ah, anything - I'm a nasty motherfucker girl

Verse Three: Ol Dirty Bastard

I'm just sittin' right, in my class at a quarter to ten right?
Waiting patiently for the class to begin right?
Teacher says "open up your texts, you! read the first paragraph on
oral sex!"
I said "Oral sex!, what kind of class is this?!"
Yo, next to me said "whats wrong with you man?, this is a lesson that
makes you feel fine, kinda ease your nerves and relax your mind!"
I said "Don't try to use no hypnotic spell!"
She said "Be my assistant, I'd show rather tell!"
My knees buckled heart started to drop
my dick grew to a size that my nerve couldnt stop
I tried to run! She yelled out "freeze!"
Pulled down my draws, dropped to her knees
Ripped of my draws as if she had claws
broke the rules that defined sex laws
She responded quick, with a slick, welcoming kiss and a ice cream lick
Oooh I begged, I begged, "Easy on my balls, they're fragile as eggs."

Part 2 coming up...
Artist: Ol Dirty Bastard
Album:  Return to the 36 Chambers: The Dirty Version
Song:   Drunk Game (Sweet Sugar Pie)
Typed by: dj.flash@pobox.com

Yo imagine, imagine the shit
Drunk as hell and shit
And you going into a fuckin bar and shit
You stumbling over bitches and everything
Falling over everywhere, throwing up and shit

Yeahhayyyeahhahhh
C'mon c'mon
Ahhahahiahhhhhhh
I want ALL y'all people to feel what I feel
See my momma taught me this SHEEEIIIT
And my daddy learned from my momma
Which is good!  Which is goodahhhhhhhhh

Sweet sugar pie, oh I wish you were mine
Lookin so good, like you know you should, yeah
And I-ayyeah, love you down, down baby
Oh my girlie, sweet my honey
You look so good to me
Love you down, all night long
Yeahhheahhhahhhh
Yeah, all night long
Yeahhahhhhhh, all night long girl
Sugar pie
Sweet oh-my-oh-my there's no lie
I love you girl, love you girl
Love you sweet pie
Yeaheahhhahhhhh

Do you love me?  Do you love me like this?
(Do you love this girl)  I know you love me.
I love you TOO!!
Ahhahhahhhah
(I'll let you know) I'm serious
I need to know that
I needs you to let me really know that
I said I'm serious, very, very serious
Aight, let's go

*sounds like Ol Dirty having the orgasm from hell on the microphone*

Yeahhhh, all night long
Yeahhaeahhahhhh
Ahhhhhhhahahyeahh
It's other groups that's better than me like the Temptations
And you other, groups
From the Motown, Philadelphia, Atlanta
(this is dedicated to you)
And you others, better than me
Mrs. Jones, don't feel disgraced baby
Because I love your soul your got it together type thing
Diana Ross
(see I don't say these things for myself)
Michael JAZZY-Jackson
(please understand or something)
NO! I'm the baddest, hip-hop man, across the world!
I don't care, what you care, I just give, what you receive!Artist: Ol' Dirty Bastard
Album:  Return to the 36 Chambers: The Dirty Version
Song:   Goin' Down
Typed by: dj.flash@pobox.com

I am the U-N-I, The Q-U-E, the G to the O-D
I said I go by the unforgettable name of the man called Unique G
Well, my name is known all over the world
To the foxy ladies and the pretty girls
I go down in history
As the baddest brother that ever could be

You couldn't show me
Didn't know me
How to be a true MC

My advantage on the M-I-C is the slang
That I manifest so you could never hang
Obviously you know my name by now
I done thrown stupid parties all through your town
Dirt Megirt...that's my motherfucking name
Love to flirt...that's my motherfucking name
They said "Who wanna be an MC?"
I am the original G-O-D
Making young ladies scream (is) my speciality
See my style, different from yours
Make young bitch want to drop their drawers

I gotta song for you all:
SOMEWHERE OVER THE RAINBOW
WHERE BLUEBIRDS FLY
SOMEWHERE OVER THE RAINBOW
WHY OH WHY

HEAR ME NOW!

Style funky, you know dat's me
KILLER BEE whohoho ONE MAN ARMY
Down for mine when I go on tour
Throw your hands in the air if you want more
Style is evil is like an wicked witch
With the mi-ca-phone spliggh!  Funky as a bitch
Which is which, makes me nasty nasty
Next on the mic is the rappin NUH
You want some of the Ason's gun
Shoot the nigga, BLAAOW, reaches no one
Then you KNOW not to touch my HOE
I like livin my own fuckin show
Artist: Ol Dirty Bastard
Album:  Return to the 36 Chambers - The Dirty Version
Song:   Harlem World
Typed by: dj.flash@pobox.com

Intro: Ol Dirty Bastard, Shorty Shit Stain, and others

(the first line originally ended "Dirty Dancin" on Jerky Boys sountrack)
Shit that makes me high
[one two, one two]
  Yo, we gonna bring it down, to Harlem World
  Bust your fuckin chops
  Yo I remember when niggaz was lookin at themselves
  on Farmers, motherfuckers was wearin double goose
  Motherfuckers actin all rowdy
I'm sayin though
[one two, one two]
  The whole trip that was never shown
I'm sayin though
See cause the knife, is the knife, of all knives
Most people gather around
To hear the show, that is comin through your town
(I was playin)
See my name [what what?]
Is somethin, that you won't know
Unless you're dowwwwwwwwn, with the Brooklyn Zoo
Other brothers come
But never... come back
(Introducing)

So basically, what the Ol motherfuckin Dirty Bastard is sayin
is that if you fuck around [one two, one two]
You're gonna get yo' ass fucked up
So don't fuck around just lay down

Verse One: Ol Dirty Bastard

I remember 		(dnnah-dah)(dnh, duh, dnh, dnnah-dah)
Not too long ago		"		"
I went to a city		"		"
And I saw a Wu-Tang show	"		"
Now I always wanted		"		"
To get, with, the band		"		"

But niggaz was singin they own songs
bein in they own worlds
So I guess I, I guess I, RARAARRRRAAHHH!!!
The terminology, the psychology
you still expect me to accept
Do what I say off of TV, kay
with the button on record and the other on
thus I press pause for a serious cause
to respect an intellect with this gratifying
now that I'm ready let the music begin 
as I detect what I wrote with my
through the time that I spent, money that I lent
rap records went up just to bounce
then became a new way to get paid
they said "Rhymin on the mic is the number one"
Then a brother get the feeling that he want to play cool
you discombumberated diabolical fool
Hog-flesh MC, go play in the mud
Another 20th century, modern day
Cannibal, humanoid, underground
chud broke loose from the god damn
dope-fiend addict why you walk with
Acquired Immune Deficiency Syndrome
when the MC's came, to live out their name
roast rockin rhymes that was always
when I elevated, and mastered the time
You was stimulated from the high post
You got shot cause you knew you were rot

Verse Two:

You're not the king of the diss
youse a queen of a bitch
And like a homosexual
your ass always switch
Niggaz wake up in the morning
you're ugly-ass Gods
Got slob around your mouth
blue code in your eye
You can't smile your teeth too gritty
Can't even move, drawers too shitty
(you know what else) You're shaped like a thistle
The holes in your drawers when you fuck been there since
YOU DUCKIN SUCKIN MOTHERFUCKIN COLD-HEARTED FAGGOT
Sperm germs on your worm DISINTEGRATED MAGGOTS
Repeat your rhymes all the time like a FUCKIN parrot
Phony gold chains only rated two carats
You tell your friends that your home is like heaven
Livin in the gutter sewer seven pipe eleven
You wear your socks twelve days in a row
Turn them on the other side so the dirt won't show
Go to school, take a shit, don't wipe your ass
Claimin on another sucka nigga in your class
YOU WANNA BATTLE?
Is it the pork on your fork, or the swine on your mind
Make you rap against a brother with a weak-ass rhyme
Swine on your mind, pork on your fork
Make you imitate the brother in the state of New York
Chain on your BRAIN, that drove you inSANE
When you tried to CLAIM, for the talent and the FAME
Not in the GAME, yet and still you CAME
Suffer the PAIN, as I demolish your NAME
Not like Betty Crocker, baking cake in the OV
Sayin this is dedicated to the one I love
Not a swine or dove, from the heaven's up above
When I rap, people CLAP, so the pushers they shove
When I rhyme I get LOOSE, better than Mother Goose
Rock the mic day and NIGHT, so you see I'm the JUICE
Like the two-six-EIGHT, politicians demonstrate

Outro:

Now hold up hold up hold up hold up
What y'all niggaz don't seem to hear
Is y'all can not FUCK with me
I saiiiiiiiiiid
ALLLLLLLLLLLLLLLLLLLLLLLLLLLLLLLLLLLLLLLLLLL
can't FUCK with me

I wanna give a shout out to my nigga Door, Door, Door
Buddah Monk, Buddah Monk, Buddah Monk
Yo, Jack, Jack, Jack, Jack, Jack
For the niggaz who's here
And the girls who's out there
Throw your hands in the air
Cause this one is more fly
Fly, fly
Flyyyyy, flyyyy
Flyyyyyyyyahhahayhahhhha
BZZZZT
Wooo!

Get your ass in the house boy, I told you
Get your ass in the house!  Get, get, in the god damn house boy!
Last fuckin time I'm gonna talk to you you hard-headed motherfucker

C'mon daddy?
I didn't mean nothin by it
but when it come to... FUCKIN with you MC's
Artist: Ol Dirty Bastard
Album:  Return to the 36 Chambers - The Dirty Version
Song:   Hippa to Da Hoppa
Typed by: dj.flash@pobox.com

My beats are slammin...

Verse One:

My beats are slammin from the rugged programming
My man Bob Marley hey my man I'm Jammin
You could never touch the stamina, while I'm rammin the
hip-hop crowd makes me rrrah rrrah rrrah
Other MC's got flipped with the ease
Beggin me for burnt cigar, stop the music please
No, cause I'm a PRO, rap to the conVO
Make a crowd say HOE, at a strip SHOW
Represent, my name is Ason, keep calm
Rhyme's too smoky, funky like a stink bomb
Boom!  Blowin up niggaz better than pullin the trigger
So you betta run for covah!
Niggaz better loosen they ass, felt the glass
A forty ounce bottle, yo yo yo yo money yo pass!
Woooh-woooh-woooh!  I sweat it live
MC gonna live God?  No, the nigga die
The max-imum of MC's are populating
The min-imum of those MC's are dominating
Now all and together now, to what what who?
Rhymes come stinky like a girl's poo-poo

Chorus:

Hippa to da hoppa and you just don't stoppa (2x)

Verse Two:

Ahh shit, here I go once again
Rhymes get shitty from the time that I spend
I come old like toe fungus mold
Ask my grand-pop pop duke gave my soul
Then I came with that old Al Green shit
Saaa-die, taught me the ballisitc
I get you blurry in your eye with a high note
down, to the Brownsville, oops you got smoked
The shit I'm droppin is stinkin up your area
When I shoot it through like a messanger carrier
I keep my breath smellin like shit so I can get
FUNKY, baby I'm not havin it

Chorus 2X

Help master! *battle ensues*
Dragon-fist!
Horse-fist!
Bastard, I didn't know who you were

Artist: Ol Dirty Bastard
Album:  Return to the 36 Chambers - The Dirty Version
Song:   Intro
Typed by: dj.flash@pobox.com

Ahh ahh, I never saw so many people tonight
I mean y'all all got it crowded up in here and that's good
I'm glad that y'all givin it up for him, y'all givin it up for him
that's good -- y'all make me want to cry or somethin
Alright ladies and gentleman, tonight is a special night
For one thing let me introduce myself my name is Mr. Russell Jones
Excuse me for that one I had to let that one low ahh-hahhh
And tonight, you're going to see that you never seen before
Somethin that, that nobody in the history of rap ever set theyself to do
This fuckin guy, that I speak to you about, is somethin crazy
He's somethin insane, he's the greatest performer every-since
uhh, what's the guys name?  [Ol Dirty!!]
Ahh, da, ahh, James Brown, he's bad, and he's a cool guy
And you'll really need him, I mean need to really get to know him
Ladies and gentleman, from all houses, to all towns
From the moons of Pluto, back down to earth
Ladies and gentleman, one more time, give it up for
The Old Dirty Doggy, I mean, the Ol Dirty Bastard
I love that guy!
(Ol Dirty!!)

Yes, how y'all doin out there?
I wanted y'all to know that tonight is a special night
Cause I'm happy to be living, you know
A nigga tried to shoot me down and shit
You know and, I don't know man it just feel good to be here man
YouknowhatI'msayin?
And I wanna let all y'all know I love you man, I love all y'all
You know, but *sniff* but I really came here tonight *sniff*
For one reason *sniff*, just cause *sniff* I don't need to cry
I don't need to cry, dub you can play that shit man, play it man
I'm tired of this shit, remember the time I told y'all
When I got burnt, gonorrhea
Well this bitch, there's a new bitch goddamnit
Ohh, bitch burnt me again with gonorrhea
So I didn't get burnt one time I got burnt actually two times
when you really look at it
Yeah, I love the girl but I had to cut the bitch off
Yeah the bitch died, I killed the bitch
She suffered a long pain bitchy ass go bitch had to go
I I knew the bitch for ten minutes of her life
But the pussy was good!  Yes the pussy was good!
I just want you to know girl!
That I dedicated, this song, well this song really was written
by Blowfly, and I want all y'all to hear this shit
It's just a poem that I writ for you girl
*paper crinkles*
*singing*
The first time, ever you sucked my dick
  Thank you thank you!
I felt, the earth tremble, under my balls
Somethin shot out of me real fast
First time

Nah I'm just kidding witch'all
How y'all feelin, listen to the album cuz it's BANGIN

  We have only thirty-five chambers, there is no thirty-six
    I know that, but, I want to create a new chamber
  Oh?  And what would that be?

Artist: Ol Dirty Bastard f/ Brooklyn Zu, Sunz of Man
Album:  Return to the 36 Chambers - The Dirty Version
Song:   Protect Ya Neck II the Zoo
Typed by: dj.flash@pobox.com

[Ol Dirty Bastard]

  See let a nigga come through with that bullshit
  Anytime you pop that shit nigga
  I'ma tell you you can suck a dick, you can suck a pussy
  I know, it'll come to what?  Say what?
Now I'ma let all you motherfuckers know
  See them knows that this is something you can't fuck
Whether you from Brooklyn, whether you from Manhattan
  Always
You from Queens nigga, I don't give a fuck, where you be motherfucker!
Where you reside... motherfucker!  How you live?  How you seeeeeeee...

Sort the stack outs, this one's the blackout
Three-fifty-seven to your mouth, blaaow!!

[Buddah Monk - Brooklyn Zu]

Dunn can you hear me?  Raw is how I'm inflicting this
It's that G type slang that makes this real sickening
Ignite my styles I got my hand pon the trigger
Starts from the smallest and hits the bigger nigga

[Prodigal Sunn - Sunz of Man]

Yo, straight actin live about them hellfires
a known mental killer, or thriller, assassin of terror
The hot bloody fatal mixture of carbonate water
Homicidal manslaughter, death is the order start the mission
Travel like the speed of wind
Through the valley of sin, I step to ville and murdered many man
Serving justice in my vicinity

[Zu Keeper - Brooklyn Zu]

(This is, Brooklyn, Zu!!)
Za-za-za, za-za-za
Zuh-za-zah, z-zz-zz-z-z-zz-zz-z-dah-duh-dnn-duh

[Murdoc - Brooklyn Zu]

I get down I get down I crack your fuckin crown
Lay around and watch some real niggaz break ground
I can't shop cuz every bro blowin up the spot
Hit rocks and niggaz know

[Killah Priest - Sunz of Man]

Yo! Niggaz grab the mic like the bites of a scorpion
Nervous, that's why the Zoo brought me in
Now bring em forth, like the tortures at the courts
Before the case begin, first break me in
his brain!  And make sure he can't maintain the calmness
Ya harmless, watch how I bomb this
stage like, mail, pre hands that be the move
Now your Posse is your fuckin Platoon
Stale cells, just flows through the air
I'm like a ninja, once I send ya down stairs
Then I get furious, imperious, the lyricist
with the cleverest rhyme
Erupt to deduct your fuckin mind

[12 O'Clock - Brooklyn Zu]

Fuck shit up on the hurry-up
Known for burying ducks through more styles than a muck
Warning you chump, brain is out for lunch
given the power punch, soon to be paid like Donald Trump
Never fall victim to no bitch
Jerked my dick, but still got more hoes than a pimp
And score more points than Shawn Kemp
Keepin powerfully strong like the center on the Knicks
Hut one, hut two, hut three, hut!!
Ol Dirty Bastard live and uncut

(Shame on a nigga who tried to run game on a...)

[Shorty Shit Stain - Brooklyn Zu]

Got more props than the President
My hardcore represent, blowin niggaz back who never had this
Cause I'm gifted, so you can get wrapped
The shit I'm kickin, send it to your MOMS for Christmas
And tell her Shorty Shit Stain sent it
Soon to have more green than the Jolly Green Giant
Cuz niggaz rap styles just down is aspired
You shoulda stayed HOME instead of picking up a microphone
But if you wanna run on up, like you TOUGH
I call your bluff, and blow you down with my hardcore
stuff, I shine like twenty-four carat

[Ol' Dirty Bastard]

Roll and stroll with the party scene
Nigga wanna know me as Mr. Clean
Wza-wza-wza-wza-Wu-Tang, flip the script and
Test my skill niggaz, you're trippin
Drugged up from sniffin, you're the one who's riffin
I'm not Opie, save that old shit for Andy Griffith
Start to flip, slip, cuz you're slippin
While you sleep I be the God on point, with Scottie Pippen
as I, jump on stage, flip rip a show
Strip and rip a hoe, wayyy like Bo
Jackson while I'm still taxin maxin
Relaxin sittin back sellin good tracks and
Again and again when I rock the jam
WANNA SEE EM UP IN THE AIR!  Throw up your hand
Introducin, one-man band in town
It's wild, with the style couldn't stand nigga
When the jump, stepped, to the center
of the rhyme inventor, MC's come at the
You get dap slapped, across the MC map
Your ass that's your ass, on a whore shot
Come on through I black and blue your whole crew
Then I get Rudy with the Hong Kong Foo
Ol Dirty Bastard, MC killer
Money maker, Brooklyn, challenger
That I lay down like towel
Then I get higher!!

[60 Second Assassin - Sunz of Man]

Here comes the illlll, type ruffer
Style be untouched I'm leavin broken down grammars on the pen
Who who what?  What brings it?  Tighter than your anus
Chambers this name is for the deepest trainers
Keep it stainless, steel, on time it is the windmill
Deadly venom kills, at the last of the Sam's Mill
60 Second, nucleus, attack on your set
Hit you with the blast (yo close the door)
Shabazz!! 
*gun blast*Artist: Ol' Dirty Bastard f/ Method Man, Raekwon
Album:  Return to the 36 Chambers - The Dirty Version
Song:   Raw Hide
Typed by: dj.flash@pobox.com

Intro: Ol' Dirty Bastard + (some Jamaican woman)

Yeah!
I wanna let allllll y'all niggaz know in here tonight
that this is that Wu-Tang shit
This that shit that's gonna get you high... {*echoes*}
See when you stimulate your own mind, for one common cause
You see, who's the real motherfuckers
See what you see, is you what you see
(Can I say it? Wu-Tang a-run tings!)
Be the original G
Rhymin on timin and in the place to be 
(Run blood claat tings!)
they love see meeeeeeee!

[Ol' Dirty Bastard]
You're a crossbreed, I'm a knowledge seed
I want ACTION, that's what I need
I never put doubt in my mind 
cause I know when I touch the mic there's the rhyme
see murder which is caused 
when you fuck with the negative and positive charge
Then they came up, out my garage 
with the hit that's gonna be LARGE
Tired of sittin on my fuckin ass
Niggaz I know, be runnin around with mad fuckin cash
Who the FUCK wanna be an emcee
if you can't get paid, to be a fuckin emcee?
I came out my momma pussy -- I'm on welfare
Twenty-six years old -- still on welfare!
so I gotta get paid fully
Whether it's truthfully or untruthfully
With my Boston bloodthirsty process
P-E-A-C-E

Chorus: Method Man

Move em in move em in 
Move em out move em out
Stick it up {*whip sound*} raw hide!

[Ol' Dirty Bastard]
Yea, gotta come back to attack 
Killin niggaz who said they got stacks, cause I don't give a fuck
{*inhales*} I wanna see blood, whether it's period blood
or bustin your fuckin face, some blood!!
I'm goin out my FUCKIN mind!!
Everytime I get around devils {*breathing hard*}
Let me calm down, you niggaz better start runnin
Cause I'm comin, I'm dope like fuckin heroin
Wu-Tang Bloodkin, a goblin, who come tough like lambskin
Imagine, gettin shot up with Ol Dirty insulin {*sucks air*}
You bound to catch AIDS or somethin
Not sayin I got it, but nigga if I got it you got it!!
WHAT?!? {*echoes*}

[Raekwon the Chef]
Yo, check the bulletproof fly shit, strong like thai stick 
then I'll remain to tear your frame, while I freaks it
like some fly new sneaks and shit
Now EAT my shit, bitch tried to creep and got hit
Now regulate, and I'll be out to set up a date
Wu-Tang, is bangin like a Ron G tape
RZA pump the shit just like a shotty
Watch me run it John Gotti
Collidin on the track, like gin and watty
Check the calender, I warn any challenger
to step up {*whoosh*} feel the blast from the silencer

Chorus

[Method Man]
Comin soon to a theatre near you it be the Wu
Yeah find yourself in the square and see it's true
Actual facts to snack on and chew
My positive energy sounds peace to you
A wise man killed one horse and made glue
Wicked women puttin period blood in stew
Don't that make the stew witches brew?
I fear for the eighty-five that don't got a clue
How could he know what the fuck he never knew?
God-Cypher-Divine come to show and come to prove
A mystery god that's the work of Yacub
The Holy Ghost got you scared to death kid boo!!

Outro: Ol' Dirty Bastard

Yeah, we always gotta keep it fly
Fly for you to feel, what you wants to feel
See Wu-Tang like to thank, all the people across the country
All the people in America, all the people outside of America
for listenin to our music
We gotta keep it fly for ya
See this ain't somethin new 
that's just gonna come out of nowhere, no!!!
This is somethin OLD, and DIRTY!!
and DIRTY!!
Yeah..Artist: Ol Dirty Bastard
Album:  Return to the 36 Chambers: The Dirty Version
Song:   Shimmy Shimmy Ya
Typed by: OHHLA.com

Intro:

[Oh, fuck, you can't even sing.]

Hey, baby, I like it rawww...
Yeah baby, I like it RAWWW!!!
Ooh, baby, I like it raww...
Yeah baby, I like it RAWWW!!!
Sh...

Verse:

Shimmy shimmy ya, shimmy yam, shimmy yay,
Gimme the mic so I can take it away.
Off on a natural charge, bon voyage
Yeah, from the home of the Dodgers, Brooklyn squad
Wu-Tang Killerrr Bees on a swarm!
Rain on ya dollar's ass, disco dorm!
For you to even touch my skill,
You gotta have the one Killer Bee and he ain't gonna kill. Now
My producer slam, my flow is like bam!
Chop that down, pass it all around!
Lyrics get hard, quick cement to the ground!
For any MC in any 52 states,
I gets psycho killerrrr Norman Bates!
My producer slam, sharp like bam!
Jump on stage, and then I dun-daaaah!

[I like the way you come]

Hey, baby, I like it rawww...
Yeah baby, I like it RAWWW!!!
Ooh, baby, I like it raww...
Yeah baby, I like it RAWWW!!!

Reverse Verse:

First Verse repeats

Artist: Ol Dirty Bastard w/ Killah Priest, RZA, Masta Killa, Buddah Monk
Album:  Return to the 36 Chambers - The Dirty Version
Song:   Snakes
Typed by: dj.flash@pobox.com

	Now number two, practiced the snake style
	He was known as the snake spirit
	He had the speed of a snake

Intro/Verse One: Killah Priest

Niggaz is like serpents out there
[snake style, no one could compete]
Serpents will bite
Lay outside, and then they roll back into they holes
They slither, in the streets of Brooklyn, New York
Slither in the streets, of Manhattan
In the streets of Queens, streets of the Bronx
Streets of Staten Island
Wherever you see em they slither
Whoever... yo
Fearsome shit... check it out
Yo, yo

It broke me up when they pat me on my shoulder
Said stay strong cuz his life is now over
I flash back to the heathens that he roll with
They shot him up and down nobody knows shit
My peers, little ears
Came up to me with a eye full of tears
Last night we was shootin dice and gettin nice
Kid rolled us, played us for our merchandise
We were in the hallway all day
Me, Steve, and Little Ray
Probably at first they tried to rob me
Back me in the lobby, pull out the shotty
Then came Scotty, fragile body
My first impression, he returned from a party
He was just stagger, smellin like Bacardi
The Dragon, braggin, how he was fuckin mad hotties
Pressed on the elevator button, then all of a sudden
He licked off, about a dozen
Slugs from the cannon, that ripped through my cousin
Nobody was standin when the nigga started bustin
Blood started to flood the floors, by the elevator doors
That's the last thing that I saw
Damn, we plan to make grands of our home
[Number two]

Verse Two: The RZA

Jagged edge, rockin God, hard as Stonehenge
Pledged whoever crossed his path get scrapped with a sledge..
..hammer, he didn't give a damn about the manor
And on the block he was called by the momma's and the grandma's
Indecent, heathen, juvenile delinquent
His weekends was frequently, locked inside the precinct
His most recent cape for catchin papes
Was snatchin up snakes on a roof butt-naked hang em off like drapes
Then ask what's the combination to the safe, with the brace
And those who didn't reply they fell straight to their face
Razor blade sharp who invades the dark
And raid more spots than Spays and NARCS iron heart like Tony Starks
A fierce lion, who never leave the crib without the iron
And on the block he be slingin rocks and duckin from the sirens
Greetin niggaz he loved with a pound, and a bear hug
Those who wanted life, they catch a slug from the snub
A Five Percent, who all knew was one to ten
He loved the Gods with his heart but his brain was filled with sin
And when he came through niggaz be lookin out
Hopin he gets shot or tooken out, or locked the fuck up in Brooklyn House
In PC, on a liquid diet, but he was louder than a riot
[Number two, the snake]

Verse Three: Masta Killa

Do the knowledge to a nigga named Trigga
Bad rude boy from the land of Jamaica
With visions to venture, to the U.S.
To receive the gold that he couldn't acheive
in his country, even though he sold mad weed
for the next man, who was the Don of the clan
Niggaz actin like they got the block locked
Like I can't sling drug raps and eat food
But I be the rudest, bad boy steppin gun totin
Shots lash out like a violent explosion
at the nigga, who tries to stop my production
Intervene the scene and slow up the CREAM
None of that black, East New York, gun talk
Niggaz I extort from Baltic to Boardwalk
Memories of injuries wounds and burns
Walkin through the streets of Medina I stand firm
Cause I know this, which means I can hold mine down
without a doubt, niggaz who front, get snuffed out
Justice must be born there's no escape
cause a snake can't be reformed so I wait
Comin in the name to proclaim your fame for protection
and you don't know no fuckin lessons?
[Number two, the snake]

Verse Four: Ol Dirty Bastard

Bad, bad, Leroy Brown
Baddest man in the whole damn town
Badder than the deep blue seaaaaa
Badder than you and meeeeee
Niggaz comin thru the trees, like a salamander, bitin
Like a piranha, but I'm bitin you back, like a black pantha
The style I'm ampin the... fuck my name, who I be?
Fuck the game, it's all about the moneyyyy!
Owahhaerahh, sometimes I get high with the Meth
Then I turn to the Killah Priest
When it comes TWELVE O'CLOCK!!
I turn into the demon beast, yo

Yo fuck that shit!
[number two, the snake]
YO! SHOW THESE MOTHERFUCKERS WHAT TIME IT IS
[number two, the snake] Rawwrarrrah
Rahhwarwaahauh, rawwaroar!!
WHOSE THE BAD-ASS?  *rawharrah*
WHOSE THE BAD-ASS?
[now number two] Rawwwaahrah
[he practiced the snake style
 he was known as the snake spirit] YEAHhhhhh

Verse Five: Buddah Monk

Lyrics, never waitin, twelve days, penetrated
When I come with the ruffness, mad niggaz try to rush this
Slip into my killings, then I slays and you're helpless
When I try to stay sick, it's yacub grafted six
Calm for the kill, knowing the style that's ill
When I drop, lyric skills, brothers say, Buddah chill!!

Outro: Ol Dirty Bastard

I don't need to rhyme no more, niggaz know, yo!
To all the Wu-Tang Clan members
The Ghostface Killer, the GZA, the RZA, the Ol Dirty Bastard
The Method Man, the Chef - Raekwon, Inspector Deck, U-God
Yo!!!
Artist: Ol' Dirty Bastard
Album:  Return to the 36 Chambers - the Dirty Version
Song:   The Stomp
Typed by: dj.flash@pobox.com

Intro

Sing the song, sing along with me
Sing the song, sing the song with me

Verse 1

When I'm with you baby, tell me why, tell me so
I ask you to go high, you tell me to go low
So I go low, [slurp], taste the shit
[Slurp], taste it again, I like it
[Rrr] I'm the original G-O-D
Making young ladies scream's my specialty
when I go DUN DUN DUN DUH, girls get hype
From the funky fresh music that was stereotyped
When I kill, that ol' mad funky flow
Not sayin Ason, duck duck disco
Or disco duck, strictly hip hop
baby baby, I can't stop
Wu, gots ta like come on through
Soo, that's the call for the Wu
I came here to rectify
BROOKLYN ZOO, terrify
Why, niggas wanna get up and rap and rap and rap
Man, fuck that
Shit, that I make it's the skit
I wanna see ya hands in the air, can ya dig it
Let's sing the song
Come on party people, all in together now, sing along

Have you ever ever ever
In your long legged life
Had a bald headed bitch
For your bald headed wife

[laughter] Gimme dat

Verse 2

Who's the baddest motherfucka in the Brooklyn town
And also representer of the Wu-Tang sound
If you wanna get up and get fucked up
Last nigga got up and got shot up
But you's a gangsta, on the boards I'll bang ya
Mess with the Wu-Tanger, I'll hang ya
You'll get shanked and spanked and alley-ooped
I admire true niggas like Dre and Snoop
Chamber number 9, verse 32 
Only speaks about BROOKLYN ZOO
That a true nigga shall come through
No-one is available to be compatible

This is chamber number 9, verse 32 
is what we call The Stomp

					[Stomp]
The stomp is down			[Stomp]
Get down for your crown			[Stomp]
Stomp					[Stomp]

[ODB]
Verse 3

Brothas always playin with the microphone
When it blows up in your face, [BOOM] you leave it alone
You couldn't touch, this style is too much
It's the rhymer, I don't give a crippled crab crutch
[Grruh] Any nigga or niggerette
Get burned to the brimecell like a cigarette
Straight up and down, I don't play around
Rhymin gets me paid madd bread by the pound
Shout out to my crew, tight as a belt y'all
Go by the name Big A, from the shelter


Artist: Ol' Dirty Bastard f/ Insane Clown Posse
Album:  The Trials and Tribulations of Russell Jones
Song:   Dirty and Stinkin' *
Typed by: DaTfamly@aol.com

* first single, send corrections to the typist

[Intro: O.D.B/Violent J/Female]
Ya'll know how I get down..Ya know what I'm sayin
(Dirty) Detroit (Dirty) What..Brooklyn..Zoo (Dirty) Yeah..What (Dirty)
Insane Clown Posse and O.D.B.
I got O.D.B and I got platinum baby what
I ain't goin nowhere until I'm Dirty and Stinkin'

[Verse 1: Ol' Dirty Bastard]
(Yeah) There's a quarter and it's Dirty and Stinkin'
Funkier than Peppy Le'Pue so I was thinkin'
About (What) droppin' this single on the charts (Yeah)
Let'n you know hey the kid has heart
I never deny myself, its when you dope
But in my last year, I had to slept on my notes 
You thought that I was weak, Huh let me speak
My rhymes come funkier than your grandfather's weeps
(Dirty) So listen hear mister don't you ever forget
The rhym'n Dirty, you couldn't even clean if you commit
Or even boring, some try ajax, only mess with the best, 48 trackz (Yo)
I get down with the a saw sound
lyrics that be flowin from miiiiles around 
So let the music shut yo' ass up
and throw the upper cut that will make you fall onto yo butt

[Chorus: Female Singer] x1
I wanna get Dirty and I (Dirty) wanna get Stinky
And I (Stinky) ain't goin nowhere till I get
(Till I) get Dirty and Stinkin' 
(It's Dirty and It's Stinkin')
I got O.D.B. and I got I.C.P
and I ain't goin' nowhere until I'm Dirty and Stinkin' 
(It's Dirty and It's Stinkin')

[Verse 2: Ol' Dirty Bastard]
(Dirty) Let me continue, verse number 2
style is wild dirty stinky like doo doo
(Get Dirty) If you hangin' around,
hen change yo' mind, It is a bad (?), Yo it's my rhyme
I sit down and I say to myself
Self, Yo are you rated top joe
I drop a single for ya to get a dose of
as I lay back like a pillow on the sofa 
You get paid (Yeah right) Bully, Fly
askin B.G. wha wha wha wha you know me
(Dirty) Sweet as a hunny bee, taste like a 40,
tick you like oohhwee
Want to drink old english so I speak old english
Ya gotta be dirty and stinkin'
And if it's not, well I guess I'm not
(?) ,  It's Dirty and  It's Stinkin'

[Chorus: Female Singer] x1
I wanna get Dirty and I wanna get Stinky
And I ain't goin nowhere till I
(Nowhere, Nowhere) get Dirty and Stinkin' 
(It's Dirty and It's Stinkin')
I got O.D.B. and I got I.C.P and I
(What) ain't goin' nowhere until I'm (Yeah Yeah)
Dirty and Stinkin' 

[Violent J]
O.Deezy. Beezy and I.C.Peezy
Together on this track forever

[Shaggy 2 Dope]
Sell me, I know my funk be kickin'
Turnin' heads like an 8 foot tropical mud chicken
They fear these juggalo flows
I'm (Dirty) dirty like Osama Bin Laden's toes
I got hatchet love, it decayed in the barn
hicken chain saw hard
I'm making neighbors uncombortable
(I wanna get Dirty and) Take me home and it's late
don't worry bout the ring in ya tub
It's the clown paint

[Violent J]
I.C.P. and O.Dizzle wildin
Workin' like a fat chicks feet at Kings Island
A whole Source 9 mics, I don't care
I'm a 10 year vet 5 plaque rat millionaire (Yeah)

[Chorus: Female Singer] x1
I wanna get Dirty and I wanna get Stinky
And I ain't goin nowhere till I get
(Till I) get Dirty and Stinkin' (It's Dirty and It's Stinkin')
I got O.D.B. and I got I.C.P
and I ain't goin' nowhere until I'm Dirty and Stinkin' 

Oh Oh...Oh..Dirty..Oh...and Stinky....
(I) (I) (Stinky, Stinky)...(It's Dirty and It's Stinkin')

Oh
Damica (What I)
I.C.P.
O.D.B.

(Dirty) (Dirty) (Dirty) (Dirty)Artist: Ol' Dirty Bastard f/ M.M.O.
Album:  Protect Ya Neck Collection, Vol. 1
Song:   Drug Free (Remix)
Typed by: goldenarms3636@hotmail.com

[Ol' Dirty Bastard]
Kids, don't get high
Mothafuckas had me up in this mothafucka, last night and shit
I'm cocained the fuck up
Paranoid as a motha.. yo I'm paranoid as a fucka
Yeah, fuck that.. yo I fuck around and shit
I sprained both of my fuckin' fingers
This shit.. man a nigga need to get.. I'm tired of gettin' high like that
Ain't nobody came in my mothafuckin' school with no mothafuckin' drugs
Stop fuckin' wit me niggas, stop fuckin' wit me
Nigga, that shits all in my family, nigga
Stop fuckin' wit me, the fuck is you talkin' bout?
On the strength, what the fuck is you talkin' bout?
We've been here too many years to stop fuckin' wit me

Nigga I'm scared of the trigga
While I'm the life giver and the life taker
I'm your father-in-law, married to mother-in-law
Got the universe movin' in the form of the sea-saw
You killed 2Pac and Biggie, you know they was rollin' wit me
You paid for your stupidity
You can't do nothin' to me! I let your fuckin' eagle fly free
Nigga, I'm pioneerin' all the sound ya hearin'
Earth from steerin', high mountaineerin'
I sincerely fuck you up severly by the yearly
Keep the sky clearly
I'm straight from the seventies
Mockneck colors wit ya bitch ass disappearance
Give me clearance, I don't want no fuckin' interference!
I'm the Big Black Jesus!

Throw ya hands in the air! And wave 'em, fuckin' Wu don't care!
And if ya +'Bout It, 'Bout It+
Like we're +'Bout It, 'Bout It+, let me hear ya say, "Oh yeah!"
Oh yeah! Well, oh yeah!

I smoke woolers too, I majored the dust
Uh, it's legal for me
I drink everything, I don't give a fuck
It's part of the universe
Hey, what else I do? I do what I do
Man, fuck that! I stays high!
I don't give a fuck!

[Trigg'nomm]
Yo yo yo I don't stop at the booze, no not, can't drop the tool
So no to C.Rules and go to these schools
Now who thinkin' elementary, class
I be see no to ecstacy and hash
Headed to the penitentiary one way
Blackin' out sippin', dust plus gun play
Knucklehead nigga in a stolen Hyundai
Sip this two, a one-to-three on Monday
If I'd have stayed in school and said no to drugs
I'd probably just be what my moms thought I was
I probably wouldn't be here pleadin' with the judge
And bitchin', it's silly, hope the God forgive it

[Ol' Dirty Bastard]
(Yeah) Kids, don't use drugs! (What what what what? M.M.O!)
Durg Free! Drug Free! Drug Free!
Durg Free! Drug Free! Drug Free!
Drug Free! Drug Free!

{*beat cuts off*}

Dun-dun-dun, dun-dun-dun
Dunh, do-do-do-duh-duh-duh
Dun-dun-dun
Maybe I was a fool, dun-do-na-na-na
When you say gettin' high wasn't cool, do-na-na-na
When I got used to this stuff, dun-duh-na-na-na
{*snorting*} Wasn't enough..

{*beat comes back in*}
Drug Free! Drug Free! Drug Free!

[Itchy-Fingas Sha]
Eh-yo, we worldwide, Drug Free but we all hide
Pumpin' adrenaline through all sides
Most guys need coke to cope, the only smoke I choke
is when I burn niggas verse for verse
My drug caper, stoppin' ya heart just like a pacemaker
We hold weight so we cross trainers
And headbangers with these black Rangers
Feds tryin' to contain us
Cuz we live dangerous, drug paraphanelias
My life changes, switch up frames in different angles
Crack'll leave ya dead or with shackles on ya ankles
Loves and thank yous, but it's a privelage for me
Givin' 'em Drug Free style, M.M.O., O.D.B.

[Outro: M.M.O.]
Baby.. Baby Jesus, Baby Jesus
Deadly Venoms - Chameleon, Poison, Scorpion, Viper
Chameleon, Poison, Scorpion, ViperArtist: Ol Dirty Bastard
Album:  Rawhide 7"
Song:   Don't U Know Part II (short version)
Typed by: dj.flash@pobox.com

Intro: Ol Dirty Bastard, Shorty Shit Stain

Yo, turn the-- drop the, drop the drums
Yeah, drop the drums
(I know all the time) Step up to the mic boo
(It be hard to use a Trojan) Yeah, let me hear you
(Cause your shit can't breath...)

(Sex is something that everybody needs) I know all the time fellas
                                        It's hard to use a Trojan
(Everybody wants, everybody loves)      Cause your shit can't breathe
                                        It's all closed in
(Sex is something that everybody needs) Put the beat on, put the beat on
(Everybody wants, everybody loves)

Chorus: Shorty Shit Stain

Sex is something that everybody needs
Everybody wants, everybody loves

(repeat 2X) - If you want it baby
              if you want it babe
              better use a Trojan!

Verse One:

I know all the time fellas, be hard to use a Trojan
Cause your shit can't breathe, it feels all closed in
You wanna slip itoff, ohh baby I like it raw
But why i wanna hurt myself for?
I was walking down my block, say my block Munroe
Said peace to this girl, girl said hello
Well hell is low, and the lowest you can go
Is thirty-two degrees, below zero
So I started to rain on this young bitch brain
Causin her a great relief of physical pain
She said, "Tit for tat, step off da bra strap.
No diamonds, no gold, I can never get a rap."
I said, "So what?", as I grabbed herbutt
Bitch smiled for a while but her  mouth kept shut
Bitch eighteen years old, just birthed a child
Young in the brain though her thoughts are wild
On welfare, but she don't care
She says, "FTF is always there."
FTF means face-to-face
Main, headquarters of your local place
Where, you collect your monthly pay
To support bad habits youse abuse everyday
There hasnever been a girl in my entire life
My girl, my next, ex or my wife
And never been one who tried to disrespect
I'm speakin bout the member of the opposite sex!
There's somethin that I gotta let out
But I don't want to be known as Ralph the Blabbermouth
Quiet as kept, she thought I was soft
But all I wanted to do, is knock her boots off
Just from obtaining the common sense
You can tell that the girl seemin rather quite dense
Other than dense she played slightly bold
But from the statement I made she could not uphold herself
She broke down, and she started to cry she said
"Oh!  I don't believe this guy!"
What what you gonna do?
May I diss her?  Yes you may
That girl's a slut, with a hole in her butt
Who used to be a meaty-bone puppy child little mutt
Came to my house smellin like trout
I said, "Doggie doggie doggie, get out!!"
She did my dick, I mean she bit bad vicious
Dirt Megirt, deep dark and delicious
She's a doo-doo BUH
Alcoholic NUH
and her ass is tighter
than a pair of vice GRIPS
Speaking of a TUH
I won't kiss, because they don't give milk
Them shit, kick, see uh
Let me tell you about the rash from the neck
it's enough to put the ring around the collar in check
She's nothin but a BUH
otherknown as a WUH
with an irritating ITCH
from trying to SWITCH
Strung out ass, foggin up glass
Tell all the NUH that the pussy first class
Smoke a bag of hash with the money she stash
But she had to play the corner just to make that cash
Pulled down her panties and scratched that rash
Then rubbed it with that a pimp had slashed
Tryied to get saved at the Tabernacle Prayer
But the only thing holy was her shitty underwear
I will change a style, always I will fix
But you can not teach an old bag...

Outro:

Yo I ain't got to say no more Son
Yo word to God man
Only thing I'm saying man, is use a Trojan
KnowhatI'Msayin?  Fore real man
Cause it's on man
YouknowhatI'msayin?  I had to learn that...


































Artist: Ol' Dirty Bastard
Album:  Hoodlum Soundtrack
Song:   Dirty the Moocher
Typed by: wubrothernumber1@hotmail.com

[Ol' Dirty Bastard]
Ladies and gentlemen introducing Cab Calloway
Featuring the Dirt Dog
First things first man you're fuckin with the worst
I'll be stickin pins in your head like a fuckin nurse
I'll attack any nigga who slack in his mack
Come fully packed with the fat rugged stack
The heat is on, I'm about to blow up the spot
All I wanna see is fire cause I'm makin shit hot
Like the blow between glocks, mad niggas I shot
Give a fuck on a cop, conversate with a lock
Down at the chop-chop, 600th and Rock
Crazy as a fox tryin to rob Fort Knox
The DeNiro-Al Pachino war
Tryin to score mad dough like a million or more
For the illegal war that's all I saw
It's all about that knot in ya
I'm alone, I roll with 6 niggas with stones
Every hour tap my phone with embezzlement stones
Get a loan from the stocks because of my pops
Fifty bills in the pocks, Wu-Gambino got props

[Cab Calloway]
But Minnie had a heart as big as a whale
Hi-de-hi-de-hi-de-hi (Hi-de-hi-de-hi-de-hi)
Hoooooooooooooooooooooo (Hoooooooooooooooooooooo)
He-de-he-de-he-de-he (He-de-he-de-he-de-he)
Heeeeeeeeeeeeeyyyyyyyyy (Heeeeeeeeeeeeeyyyyyyyyy)

[Ol' Dirty Bastard]
Elevator scheme with the scheme to catch CREAM
Some diamond rings, jewels all types of priceless things
Just in case you don't make it to the safe
Don't talk to Jakes or your whole shit be laced
Got a bomb bout ready to blow up shit
The White House nuh be quiet as a mouse
My job is hundred proof, better know the scoop
Got niggas undergrounds, in your walls, in your roofs
About made zoo, 6-6-6-6-2
Cause I'm goin all out with the supplies of Balu
I'm unstoppable, my six man team is unstoppable
Stickin my middle fuckin finger at you
Livin in America's fuckin fucked up
When I was young some say I had no sense
I rhymed all day until my throat got tense
And bought em by the cage from my lungs to my knees
In the winter I cough, all summer I sneeze
Ah-choo! Then I was sore, there was only one cure
Original rhymes wholesome in thought
Democratics are debatin wanna be the imitatin
But the knowledge that I'm givin positively stimulatin
I acknowledge any MC in a South Bronx town
South Proof Projects, did they really go down
Shit, I remember when I was 12 years old
I didn't know about frontin or playin a role
I thought I was slick, I fell harder than bricks
With my best lyrics and my uptown ticks
Prince start jackin in my baseball cap
I'm tellin many chit-chats step off my jockstrap
Approach this party other known as a jam
Lookin for my cousin Bam-Bam Sleepingham
>From front to back the jam was packed
Over there some dance, over there I just macked
I looked around then I started to walk
Heard an older woman's voice and a silly slang talk
The kid was nice for payin the price
And give weak MCs beneficial advice
Yes, beneficial meaning good for more
Frontin cause with the mamas would have loved to explore
Studied MC and changed lyrics around
Before I became a member of the lost and sound
My words I strung, I bettered my voice
Rollin over people known to be top choice
Ch-ch - BLAOW BLAOW BLAOW
Hoodlum

Hi-de-hi-de-hi-de-hi (Hi-de-hi-de-hi-de-hi)
Ho-de-ho-de-ho-de-ho (Ho-de-ho-de-ho-de-ho)
He-de-he-de-hee-de-heeee (He-de-he-de-hee-de-heeee)
Hooooohhhoooooooooooooooooooooooo (Hooooohhhoooooooooooooooooooooooo)Artist: Ol Dirty Bastard f/ 12 O'Clock
Album:  Tales From the Hood soundtrack
Song:   Ol Dirty's Back
Typed by: dj.flash@pobox.com

Intro: Ol Dirty Bastard

Sup?  Let's go.
(Yo Snoop Dogg!  Yo Dre!  Yo Too $hort!  E-40, and the motherfucking Click!)
Nuff respect to the West coast.
(Duhhn duhhn duhhn)
Yo, Ol Dirty Bastard coming through
Know what I'm saying?  I got the East coast locked the FUCK down
Hear my SHIT, nigga! (Dirty dirty dirty, Brooklyn!)

Verse One: 12 O'Clock

Shit is crazy real in the field
I watched niggaz blood get spilled over five dollar bills
And major drug deals on the real
See a nigga get meals and his bitch get him killed
In this American dream to get some cream
You're ownin a Beem, and your face in magazines
12 O'Clock maintains in the game
Bring the Pain to smokin Method, main
It's not all about the fame, silly ass dames
Get a gold record and you change
And for the niggaz sellin cocaine, you're too blame
Black people lives ain't the same
And that's the Tale in my Hood
Niggaz is up to no good, you better watch em in them hoods

Verse Two: Ol Dirty Bastard

I always thought livin life was easy
Go to school, get a job, yo it couldn't be me
So instead, I played my bed
My momma got fed, and now a nigga livin with a dread
My best fuckin friend, knew him since ten
Nigga feed me CREAM, let me whip the Benz
Houses all over Texas, lightning gold Lexus
He had enough respect to dress this
Expensive Tim suits, girl wearin fly Gucci boots
Put me on like POOK!
Every morning that I awake
Ten G's in my fuckin face, combination to the safe!
Son run the state, carrying coke by the weight
Nigga put pounds in the weed gate
And it's ran by Ol Dirty
12 O'Clock, my little brother, he keeps it dirty
Dirty

[Fuck all that motherfucking drug selling shit
 I wanna see some motherfucking lyrics
 I wanna hear some motherfucking lyrics
 What up nigga, what?]

Hahahahahahahahahahaha
I got you nigga

Verse Three: 12 O'Clock, Ol Dirty Bastard

I'll rip mics on site you know the type
New Jack, this is my City like Wesley Snipes
Go fly a kite or somethin, make some muffins
I come up bad in the town like Charles Bronson
Now set your speaker and I'll do you for that reason
12 is no joke I bring wreck through the seasons
Solomon, contend, many more but just when
That Joker act you can save for Jack Nicholson

One two and three, through your rap fatigue
In the MC world, is a minor league
What you speak, you swear it's unique
It's just a peek, physique, of an old antique
Don't expect a project, then it's bound to freeze
Your whole head is stuck and stiff
Next Siamese, I never liked rhymes
That's incomplete, then again obsolete
I shall repeat, there's an Easy Street
For niggaz who earned, then learn your sojourn
Then you return, as an intelligent, positive, messanger
Not an experiment negative Lucifer
With a tittling gloss of crafted skin
Nothing like spring sauce, of the true origin
Who would score, the wizard of war
Came in best man was a god damn dinosaur
No more jungle-like living, from the Blue Lagoon
It's not an Animal House, National loon Lampoon
If you understand the what when
Why how, are you fellas who exempt
or to disallow, a fresh MC, that will knock you down
I gets dizzy spellbound like a merry-go-round
While I'm freaking, shall I expose
You take a subject, and then you decompose...
Artist: Ol Dirty Bastard f/ MC Eiht, E-40
Album:  Shimmy Shimmy Ya 12" -- Studio Ton Remix
Song:   Shimmy Shimmy Ya (Studio Ton Remix) *
Typed by: dj.flash@pobox.com

* - clean version is the only version that exists 

Intro:

Oooh baby I like it raw
Yeah baby I like it rawww (with your MC at the epicenter)
Oooh baby I like it raw (sup boo?  sup?  sup baby?)
Yeah baby I like it rawww
Oooh baby I like it raw (it's E-40 man)
Yeah baby I like it rawww (sup baby?)
Oooh baby I like it raw (I see y'all, I see you whassup y'all)
Yeah baby I like it raww (sup??  SUP???)

Shimmy shimmy ya shimmy yeah shimmy yay
Gimme the mic so I can take it away
Off on a natural charge, bon voyage
Yeah from the home of the Dodger, Brooklyn squad
WU-TANG!  Killa beez on the swarm
Reign on your college-aXX disco dorm
For you to even touch my skill
You gotta go the one killa bee and he ain't for the kill

Verse One: MC Eiht

I'm givin you that funky funky aXX-sXXX
(That sXXX) that you gotsa ta fXXX wit
So stand back cause I don't hope my funk
threw a bunk on your silly billy aXX and you too soft
I'm givin that brain a little tickle
I'm thicker than a buXX-lickin indo popsicle (popsicle)
Fool you know I'm too cold
I leave that ass hangin, hangin like a bXXXX on hold
can suck my DING, you bring like static
I shoots like a fXXXXn automatic (automatic)
Classy ------- I'm in em
I'm deadly like a m---------n snake's, venom
So it's on bad cuz these zaggin come around your block
and we strapped with the Mac
And you get served like a clucker
E four oh and the Eiht, down with that dirty moXXXXXXer
Geyeah

Interlude: [backwards verse]

The nigga that discovered electricity
Yo gimee some of that Hurricane SO!

Verse Two: E-40, Ol Dirty

Cookin y'all on the burner inside a Rolex
Clocked, to a fat ass nXXXa clad in black, honk!
Might act my color but now E four oh ain't no dummy though
Might not know how to read and write but I do know how to count money hoe
NXXXa this game ain't wrinkled, hoe I don't need no starsight
to serious aXX nXXXa twenty-first of March
Time's up in this b---h right, East West whoride
BXXXXes don't understand my isht that we be servin

Uhhhh, I'm from the Bed-Stuy, now do or die
I got somethin for your a-- now I'm passin lye
See E-40 Click roll thick like a hoe drippin ----
The A-von, isht

Chorus:

Oooh baby I like it raw
Yeah baby I like it rawww
Oooh baby I like it raw
Yeah baby I like it rawww
Oooh baby I like it raw
Yeah baby I like it rawww
Oooh baby I like it raw
Yeah baby I like it rawww

Verse Three: Ol Dirty Bastard

Most MC's get all too hyped
From the tent we'll rhyme and take you out with a tank
It's not MC just an MC bee
Weak on your words you never thought of by freein
positive thoughts that I let come out
Ask the God A-SON I know what it's about
On the mic I'm a leader, school I was a reader
When it come to f----n I'm a strong good breeder
MC max and we worn out wax
Collect the cash money, without ever being taxed
and then I, got your attention
I'd like to mention, DON'T BATTLE ME at any rap convention

Yo I'd like to give a shout out
to all you live zaggin out there
And also like to give a shout out
to all you punk ------ out there
I wanna give a shout out
to all the true black women, because I love you
And I also wanna give a shout out
To them fake a-- b----s out there
YaknowhatI'msayin?
Artist: Ol Dirty Bastard
Album:  Shimmy Shimmy Ya 7" CD single
Song:   Shimmy Shimmy Ya (extended version)
Typed by: dj.flash@pobox.com

Intro:

Oooh baby I like it raw
Yeah baby I like it rawww
Oooh baby I like it raw
Yeah baby I like it rawww

Verse One:

Shimmy shimmy ya shimmy yam shimmy ya
gimme the mic so I can take it away
off on a natural charge bom-voyage
yeah from the home of the doge brooklyn scwad
Wu-Tang killer bee's on a swarm 
rain on your collage ass disco dorm
for you to even touch my skill
you gotta put the one killer bee and he ain't gonna kill 
now chop that downpass it all around
lyrics get hard quick cement to the ground
for any em-cee in any fifty two states
I get psycho, killer, Norman Bates
my producer slam my flow is like bamm
jump on stage ah then I dip doown

(I like the way you talk)

Chorus: repeat 2X

Oooh baby I like it raw
Yeah baby I like it rawww
Oooh baby I like it raw
Yeah baby I like it rawww

[backwards verse incorporating part of Verse Two]

Verse Two: (additional extended verse)

See, when a nigga say he likes it raw
He means dirty, down to the floor
see my name is the Ol'DB and I'll beat your ass

for the ladies who know me tell them who the fuck I be
for the niggas who know me tell them who the fuck I be
my style comes down on ya'll like rocks
by the doc
umm by the flock
by the creak by the flock 
got east coast locked down padlocked
my sulu be all all down by the flock

Chorus: repeat 2X
Verse One: repeat

Yo ya'll know the lyrics come on sing with me

Chorus: repeat 2X





Artist: Ol' Dirty Bastard f/ 62nd Assassin
Album:  Unreleased *Return* Promo
Song:   Dirty & Stinkin'
Typed by: SeanD@Wu-Tang.com

ODB:

Yo, this ain't a Wu-Tang type slang, know what I'm sayin?
I wanna just represent the whole Clan
you know what I'm sayin?
The GZA, Prince Rakeem, you know what I'm sayin?, Ghostface Killah
Shallah Raekwon, Inspectah Deck, Baby-U, Method Man, 12 O'Clock
Dirty O', 62nd Assassinater, know what I'm sayin?, style is coming
Boom

This recorded and it's dirty and it's stinkin', funkier than regular
Abuse, so I was thinkin' - about, droppin' this single on the charts
lettin ya know, hey! - the kid has heart, I never deny myself as being
Dope, but in my last jam, didn't slep on my notes
You thought that I was weak, huh?, let me speak
My rhymes come funkier than ya grandfathers feet, so listen mister
Don't you ever forget the rhyme is dirty, you couldn't even clean it
With Comet, for even more axe, some try Ajax
Only mix with the best, 48-tract-ya
I get down with the 8 sole sounds
Lyrics that be flowin' from miless around, so let the music
Shut ya ass up, then feel the uppercut, now I make ya fall to ya rutt

62nd Assassin:

Cabush!!!!, can I get up? - Oof!! - Crazy Stouf!!
Mad chamerz comin' at ya!, a 62nd Assassiner, strap into ya staminer
A hardcore freakin' avenor, tearin' up the vibe for set
Wit the mystery of Chess, -Boxin' at your mutherfuckin' text
Then ya slip, when I flip, only on that combatic shit
Rhymes comin straight from the fuckin' pits, so toggle up
Don't puddle up, better yet just duck, I'm callin all earth-forms
Huh!, I don't play games, I make pain, or migraines
Stick it to ya ass like pain's, who in the hell did, ever drop shit
Rammin' the mic, with 5 fingers of death, then bombed shit
Like big momma, ya long gone, along with desert storm
But have ya not heard, Word is bond

ODB:

62nd Assassinator, comin' at a theatre near you
It's Dirty and it's Stinkin', Yeah
It's Dirty and it's Stinkin', Yo
It's Dirty and it's Stinkin', Yes
It's Dirty and it's Stinkin'
[I wanna tell ya somthin']

Yo!, Let me continue, verse number 2, style is wild, dirty stinkin
Like (? - doodoo), If ya hangin' around, ya change ya mind
It is a bad influence, but yo!, it's my rhyme
I sit down and I say to myself [self], yo
are you ready to top ya self?
I drop the single for you to get a dose of, As I lay back
Like a pillow on a sofa, gettin' paid?, yehhh!, right, would it?
Why asking me, G? what, what, what, what, you know me
My mouth is sugar, sweet as a honey bee, taste like a forty
Stinkin' like Old-E'!, but I drink Ol' English so I speak Ol' English
You gotta be Dirty and Stinkish, and if it's not, well I guess I'm not

The A-S-O-N my friends
It's Dirty and it's Stinkin'
It's Dirty and it's Stinkin', Baby
It's Dirty and it's Stinkin', Yes
It's Dirty and it's Stinkin', I said
It's Dirty and it's Stinkin'
It's Dirty and it's Stinkin'

Over and over
Wu-Tang comin through ya townArtist: Ol' Dirty Bastard
Album:  Urban Renewal (Phil Collins Tribute)
Song:   Sussudio
Typed by: chris.wilcock@btinternet.com

Dirty?

Phil Collins
Ol' Dirty
Yeah, Su-su-ssudio
Sudioo

[Ol' Dirty Bastard]
This recording is dirty and a-stinkin'
Pukier than Pepe' le Peu
So I was thinkin
About, droppin' this single on the charts
Letting you know
"Hey! The kid has heart"
I never deny myself as being dope
But in my last jam, niggas slept on my notes
You thought that I was weak
Uhh, let me speak
My rhymes come funkier than your gram'phone would speak
So listen, mister, don't you ever forget
The rhyme are dirty, you couldn't clean it with Comet
Or even Morax, some try Ajax
Only mix with the best, 48 tracks
Yo, I get down with the eight song sound
Lyrics that be flowing from miiiiiles around
So let the music shut ya ass up
And feel the uppercut that'd make you fall to your butt, w-what!

Chorus:

[Female singer]
If he calls me, I'll be there
I'll come running, anywhere
He's all I need, all my life
Feels so good if I just say the word
Su-Su-ssudio
Just say the word, oooh
Su-Su-ssudio
Uh ohh

[Ol' Dirty Bastard]
Let me continue, verse number two
Style is wild, Dirty stinkin' like doo-doo
If your hangin' around, you change your mind
If it's a bad influence, but yo it's my rhyme (my rhyme)
I sit down and I say to myself
Sell, yo, or you on the top, shelf
I drop this single for you, to get a dose of
As I lay back, like a pillow on a sofa
Gettin paid? Yeah, right, fully
My ass can be G one one one
You know me
My rhyme is sugar
Sweet as a honey bee
Tastes like a ??
Stinkin' like OE, yeah
Well I drink Old English
So I speak Old English
If not, I'd be dirty and stinking
And if not, well I guess I'm not
The A-S-O-N, my friend
You wouldn't understand

Chorus:

[Female singer]
If he calls me, I'll be there
I'll come running, anywhere
He's all I need, all my life
Feels so good if I just say the word
Su-Su-ssudio
Just say the word, oooh
Su-Su-ssudio
Uh ohh

If he calls me, I'll be there
I'll come running, anywhere
He's all I need, all my life
Feels so good if I just say the word
Su-Su-ssudio
Just say the word, oooh
Su-Su-ssudio
Uh ohh

If he calls me, I'll be there
I'll come running, anywhere
He's all I need, all my life
Baby
Su-Su-su-ssudioArtist: Ol' Dirty Bastard and Coolio
Album:  Slam soundtrack
Song:   The Park
Typed by: dj.flash@pobox.com

[ODB]
Yeah, youknowhatI'msayin, to you?
I was in Riker's Island, youknowhatI'msayin?
High impact, youknowhatI'msayin?
They they had me pickin cigarettes (SLAM!)
A thousand cigarettes up off the floor
Doin push-ups, all that bullshhhh
Yo I'm tryin to (SLAM!)
I just wanna give a shout, to all the jails everywhere
Cause you know, I know it's a game (Just SLAM!)
YaknowhatI'msayin?  The government got a game
Get all the brothers locked down
(This one, is a hit, it's called SLAM!)
But it ain't like that baby!
Knahmsayin?  I'm not havin it no more
(Doin it at the park)
Me personally, knowhatI'msayin?
(Doin it LAH-Lah-LAHHH!)
Yo, check this out
(Ohhh yeah, rock the park)
This is the jam called SLAMMMMM
(Ohhh yeah, rock the park)

(Doin it at the park)
(Doin it LAH-Lah-LAHHH!)
(Ohhh yeah, rock the park)
(Ohhh yeah, rock the park)

Yo, yo bust thissssssss! Yo white boy don't you got a shadow?
Black boy don't you got teeth, what the fuck is the beef?
Some tame buck nigga in the movie, said a little poetry
Had some problems with the cops, cause his man gun was hot
And of course, fuck that red tape
(*gavel pounds three times* "Guilty!!")

[Coolio]
I gotta spit at y'all, they runnin some shit on y'all
Or should I say yes, cause I'm still on the bus
So y'all is really me it's just, y'all is already you
I hereby do declare, all of us is we
Quit your silly-ass games and, petty-ass dirts see and put
greed to the side for good
for your heart it's like a court minus time divide

(Doin it at the park)
(Doin it LAH-Lah-LAHHH!)
(Ohhh yeah, rock the park)
(Ohhh yeah, rock the park)
(Doin it at the park)
(Doin it LAH-Lah-LAHHH!)
(Ohhh yeah, rock the park)
(Ohhh yeah, rock the park)
(A-dubba-dubba-dah!)

[Coolio]
We live in a society created by an empire
that's based on terror, welcome to the One World Era
A complete interruption to your lil' paultry ass life
that you thought you was livin, and what you been given
No more Benzes to roll in, fat-ass stacks of money
Cause ain't no such thing as money
I bet y'all niggaz think it's funny
Put your money where your mouth or where your mouth used to be
Cause ain't shit on this planet, or in this life for free
We gonna do it like Osirus and The Warriors in the dark
Get your niggaz and my niggaz and some mo' niggaz
and have a meeting in the park!

[ODB]
Lost in the sauce, cause you think you got force
Get this across, there is only ONE boss
A NUH got it locked down, while NUH be dumbfound
and got alllll on the surrounnnnnd!!
Who you think own the ships planes and trains?
Now you got a white man's name!

(Doin it at the park)
(Doin it LAH-Lah-LAHHH!)
(Ohhh yeah, rock the park)
(Ohhh yeah, rock the park)
(Doin it at the park)
(Doin it LAH-Lah-LAHHH!)
(Ohhh yeah, rock the park)
(Ohhh yeah, rock the park)

[C]	Yo whassup son?
[O]	Yo whaSSUP lOC?
[C]	You ready to heat it up at make this system smoke?
[O]	BLAOW, BLAOW, BLAOW

[Coolio]
We want knowledge, we want wisdom
Y'all want bars, Cristal and bitches

[ODB]
We want off shore bank accounts, property
We wanna show you how to do it, properly

[Coolio]
Fuck your friends, stack your ends
The next time somebody tryin to run game, then pretend
that they runnin game then, run game back and

[O]	Yo let him let him roll off in his Cadillac
[C]	Cause real players play the back
[O]	Old schooL FLAVA!!!!

(Doin it at the park)
(Doin it LAH-Lah-LAHHH!)
(Ohhh yeah, rock the park)
(Ohhh yeah, rock the park)
(Doin it at the park)
(Doin it LAH-Lah-LAHHH!)
(Ohhh yeah, rock the park)
(Ohhh yeah, rock the park)
(Doin it at the park)
(Doin it LAH-Lah-LAHHH!)
(Ohhh yeah, rock the park)
(Ohhh yeah, rock the park)Artist: Ol' Dirty Bastard
Album:  Brooklyn Zoo 5" CD single
Song:   Give it to Ya Raw
Typed by: wubrothernumber1@hotmail.com

[Ol' Dirty Bastard]
Give it to ya raw!
Yo, it's that old school shit
About 12 years old

Let's get physical, operate your brain to function
I remember the Gods at the junction
Conjunction junction what's your function?
I summed it up as the Ason sumption
Known on the microphone as Crazy Crucial
Dippin low on an MC like you and doin you
Somethin, so step to the shit right now
Kickin on erything in my god damn town
Doin expressure, a jam it to deadly
Daredevil doin, cause I am the U-N
I-Q-U-E funky fresh
Funky do he get hype?
You're motherfuckin right I do
Ason, break it down sure anytime
A serious outstandin never end it clever in the rhyme
Break down your shit, wherever you come
There's no one who can fuck with Ason
I paralyze you make you realize who
Lost concern with my god damn crew
Quiet as kept when I start any fuckin riots
Even before you do in my nigga? Don't try it!
For you to get close enough to my style
You have to travel miles and miles and miles
To find a special rhyme like mines, you gotta look
At what you find in the Brooklyn Zoo
Raw exit, killin the beat with all your might
You love a hip hop song baby, I don't wanna be right
Wake up, what, what, losin your head
Woke up on the wrong side of the bed
Juvenile faction of hard, you say you're livin large
You're the head nigga in charge

I give it to ya raw!
I said I give it to ya raaaawww!!
I'm Ason baby, I'm the Ason baby
I'm Ason baby, I'm the Ason
I'm Ason baby, I'm the Ason
Givin it to ya raw baby
The raw deal, because

These lovely rhymes made by the one and only
I'm Ason, there's nothin phony about me
Steady of course so hard to handle whip it
Like a specialist I write my own music
Now I make ya dance, get drunk or act wild
Baby sayin "Hey hey I love your style"
Whether you're sober, known just to holder, casanova
Get chopped with the lawn mower
So get busy as Ason perform
On and on ladies scream my name Ason
That means the Ason girls fanatic
Repeat it so much you get a throat infection
Yo I relieve the ones who believe
You're in the need of the God degree
That I build on with style and finesse
Keep MCs in check like a game of chess
So to the folks, come to my rehearsals
I look so good I should be on the commercials
On TV that tell original lie
Of the Ason most high
Who's your Jesus? Stop me and question
They'll never forget they can choke on position
Don't charge a cent of excellent
Add the ingredients of Ason's elements
Fire, water, cold earth wood
Yo do the knowledge because it is good
Enough to overstuff jumbo pack
Brother like Ason will never be attacked
A by a nigga couldn't figure how to pull the gun trigger
And I say yo get the fuck outta here!Artist: Ol' Dirty Bastard f/ C-Murder, E-40
Album:  Trials & Tribulations of Russell Jones
Song:   Anybody *
Typed by: KnowledgeGod@btinternet.com

* original and remix have identical lyrics

[Intro: C-Murder]
Tytanic, let's wake 'em up, ya heard?
Yeah, it's real out here
Killa block notch, wit' the ODB
NYC, CP-3, nigga, what?
Let me ask you a question
What do you think about the game now? (What you think about it now?)
How you feel like my name now (How you feel 'bout me now?)
How you feel like C now?
What do you think about the ODB now? (What?)
What do you think about the game now? (What you think about it now?)
How you feel like my name now (How you feel about me now?)
How you feel like my name now (I told you I wanted somethin')

[Ol' Dirty Bastard]
Yeah, bite that point, the habit apprievin'
No hope to find, that you're misbehavin'
Link your crupid, fuck your brewin'
Flash the burgers on your crewin'
Cuz the monks, skippin' from the other MC's
I got the amazing ability
I get on the mic so you can have a ball
I could fly through the air and stick to the wall
I could take a punch or get hit by a car
Could go to the nearest or farthest star
As a matter of fact it's what I won't talk about
Pop a word out of trace just to be in the house

[Chorus: E-40]
So pimped out about my big spendish
I got a 20, 6 O'Clock extra chrystall
Anybody dat wanna pop off at the lip
Anybody that wanna give me banana split
It's only E-40, Murder in this bitch
All the money motivated me to biatch
Three soldiers from the East, South and West
Street soldiers holdin' it down for they vets

[C-Murder]
I'm C-Murder, murder mass ten, I'm wit' the Dirty Bastard
And my flows comin' faster than a jet to Alaska
I ask ya how you feelin' my collabo'
The CP3, the ODB from NYC the ghetto B
Light it up, let it cook, look in the mirror, let me crush
Don't worry about how it looks, put some momey on my books
Only God can judge me now
That's when I heard the click click, I was Christened
I ain't with them are you wid that
Let them whistles out them pistols
Let loose on them troops and then shake 'em like Cherok smoke
I slam dunk 'em like Shaq
I wanna be free, I'm not guilty, do you feel me?

Chorus

[E-40]
Hey sluggin', wanna hit this rock dowm (rock down)
I only got one world, mane, I feel like take this to the thick of him
Under there, got the smell, you do the hoe you hear
Fuck it there, let me get a swig of that Thunder Bird
OK, it's cute, it's squashed
Now, no though mane, lets have a back wash
Yeah you trippin', "no I ain't", yeah you is
That boy spittin', what's his name? 40, quarter, biatch

[Ol' Dirty Bastard]
I stage a place, place stage a me
I'm a vision of truth, just a true MC
Love hiphop so much, mic won't untouched
Thugs grow unbust, bitch won't get fucked
Every 40 ounce cracked, every napsack packed
Ol' Dirty kickin' your ass, the record gets scrapped
Oh, the record gets scrapped, the record gets scrapped

Chorus

[Outro: E-40]
And there you have it
E-40 the bonzerelli
The ballatician from the Soyo block soil
Turf hall, been through it all
Hard 'til we have it all (hard 'til we have it all)
Ay look it's C-Murder and Ol'Dirty Bastard
If you don't stay your ass out of trouble
What's up boy? ODB
We got the same motherfuckin' birthday
Novermber the 12th to be exact motherfuckers
What the fuck you drinkin'? Fortay
Get 'em off this motherfucker..Artist: Ol' Dirty Bastard f/ Mack 10, Royal Flush
Album:  Trials & Tribulations of Russell Jones
Song:   Caught Up
Typed by: KnowledgeGod@btinternet.com

[Chorus: sample]
Some people get caught up
Some try and get rolled up
Some people... (x9)

[Ol' Dirty Bastard]
Ol' Dirty kickin' your ass..
The things that you learnt in class is trash
You can't do nothin' wit' it, I put you in the past
You broken motherfuckers, shut the fuck up
I do it 'til you bad luck and head gets plucked
The only thing on your brain is to give me this cash
Stay out of my business 'cause I'm takin' your tash
This struggle on the ming, non of y'all bring
I got y'all in.. flavouring

Chorus x2

[Mack 10]
I seem to fuck about a bitch or a crooked ass cop
I'm a burst that, it's dealin', the hustle don't stop
I got stones and hairone, ecstasy and weed
Meth, imphetamine, sherm, sticks and speed
Pay it high wid, dope is all I got to give
I'm a ghetto nigga dog so I get it how I live
Got money, lock 'em off, fuckers still I got drama
Got two strike dog and five baby mamas
With new strain I maintain, I'm ready and willin'
to keep change on niggas brains to keep the blood spillin'
I hate it but it ain't complicated, it's real simple
Fuck with me and know you get a hole in your temple
I ain't gonna play you niggas, I'ma slay you niggas
Don't take but a few figures and a few new triggers
Mack 10 livin' legend, every West coast rhymin'
Straight hoo bangin' gangsta and all rhymin' sodom, it's bad

Chorus x2

[Royal Flush]
Shut up, let me talk for a minute, alot of bull shit on my mind
Dealin' with crime, alot of y'all dealin' wid rhymes
Stuck on the grind, crackheads cookin' my pies
Startin' off on the 1-2-5, the block's mine
Bucket the spine, DH tryna tap my line
Stop my producitons, wanna know my money discussions
Who I roll wid, "buy so many cars is he legitin' of my dick"
It didn't matter when I ain't have shit
They done watch me in helicopters, parklin' in my crib
All I wanna feed is my kids, no time to do a bid
Feel me, I forced the whole guns a while for my ones
Didn't sell drugs, where the money come from?
No school, no job, no bitch, no food, fuck that
Do what I do to make my shit true
And I make it hard on them boys who blew they cats charges
If I go to jail you know I'm blowin' on the Sergeants

Chorus x5Artist: Ol' Dirty Bastard
Album:  Trials & Tribulations of Russell Jones
Song:   C'Mon
Typed by: dj.flash@pobox.com

Intro:
Yo, are you taping baby?
Baby are you taping?
Ohh yeahhahhahheeyahhhyahhhhohhhyahhhh
Baby baby c'mon, baby c'mon, baby c'mon
What the fuck anybody wanna do?
Right motherfucking now!
Ahhahhahhhah

[Ol' Dirty Bastard]
I'm the God who's ahead of the Lords
Dirty Bastard from the Wu-Tang squad
Can I get raw, yes I get Dirty to the floor
Rhymes, hittin on your mind, you could never ignore
Hip-hop to me is like a place to be
My specialTY from me to you is emCEE
Say what you wanna sayyyahhh, baby sayahh
I flip the microphone-ah, any dayahh
I'm mad swift because I got that gift of gab
Niggaz get mad, your ass stink never had
this talent that I got will resound the spot
MC's, you got paid a lot
You ever notice a black man damn mostly slams
When it come to the money yo it ain't funny
It's what you gotta do what you got to do
C'mon, can I get a Wu-Tang
Wu, Tang, Wu, Tang, Wu, Tang, Wu, Tang
Wu, Tang, Wu, Tang, Wu, Tang, it's on your brain
I get riggy diggy raw when it's time to get
on the dancefloor shotgun kill the shit
BLAOW, then you won't step to me
Thinking is he really raw as he said he'd be
If I wasn't really raw, standing here on the floor
You'd be like BOOOOO HE AIN'T NO HARDCORE
Niggaz play like they live but won't survive
Jumpin up and down ticklin that jive when you ticklin gab
I'm an average man, G-O-D fan
Let it be known who's the champ, Wu-Tang Clan!
It's coming through and WU, boy it's bad too!
Throw your hands in the air, if you don't care
WHO, the Ol Dirty Bastard be
oh me on my, you be hoppin on my shit just like a fly
BZZZZZT, all around
The dirtiest stinkin sound down to the ground
What what, what you wanna do?
What you wanna do when I'm coming for you?
I'm gonna give it to ya, bayyybah, bayybah,
bayybahhhahahahahahahahahahah...Artist: Ol' Dirty Bastard f/ Big Syke, Too $hort
Album:  Trials & Tribulations of Russell Jones
Song:   Dogged Out
Typed by: KnowledgeGod@btinternet.com, dj.flash@pobox.com

[Intro: Too $hort (Ol' Dirty Bastard)]
Bitch you knew I was a dog when you met me
How you gonna get mad at me now?
Cuz I got bitches.. everywhere
Bitch I'm a player, y'know
(Y'know, killa, y'know'I'msayin'
I said shit, I said, that's dat monster +Dog Shit+, y'know'I'msayin'
This is all dedicated to all you hoes)
And bitches

[Ol' Dirty Bastard (Too $hort)]
Shame on a nuh, who tried to step TUH
the Ol' Dirty Bas, put my foot up your UHH
Bitch, you walk around with your bra too tight (beitch)
It's alright, you still gon' get fucked tonight
Hoeeeeee! (bitch fucky) Stinkin ass hoe!
You're the type of bitch don't appreciate shit
Never had shit, so you won't be shit
That pussy there, couldn't satisfy a hair
on my body, treat me like a lolli and slob me doooooown (beitch)
I'm Doo Doo Brown! (beitch) Hehahahaha
Tossed salad, oh you in some shit now
Callin me a dog, well leave a dog alone
Cuz nothin can stop me from buryin my bones
in the backyard, of someone else's house
Ol' Dirt Dog, but I'm not +Dogged Out+
Here comes Rover, sniffin at your ass
Pardon me bitch, as I shit on your grass
That means hoe, you been shit-ted on!
I'm not the first dog that's shitted on your lawn

[Chorus x2: Ol' Dirty Bastard]
Callin me a dog, well leave a dog alone
Cuz nothin can stop me from buryin my bones
in the backyard, of someone else's house
Ol' Dirt Dog, but I'm not dog out

[Big Syke]
Right behind my pitbull, all wrong
That wanna make the cat moan all night long
Puppy don't take me wrong, but it's gon'
Be monkeys up, so call me gettin' toned
Get gone thong, crew comin' through
Big Syke daddy wid the Brooklyn Zu
You know what to do, freaky sucky sucky
Won't you show the crew how you play wit' the monkey
Let him see you don't fake it, and you can take it
It's only the bigger bone, gotta make it
Baby shake it in the worst way, OK
Up in you in the parle
My forte is a freakyness, look at this
I don't kiss anythin' that I don't miss, runnin' sense
to get licked from the nuts to the crack of my butt
I'm a dog, so what, but you still give it up, Wu/woof

Chorus x2

[Too $hort]
Beitch, this is what I tell these hoes
Don't sweat it baby, you'll never be my lady
Take this bone, straight to the dome
And get on (get on), cuz I don't wanna talk
Shut the fuck up if you done wanna walk
We on the same page? I thought so
You know them +Big Dogs+ hit you wit' their paw hoe
Big pimp (pimpin') jump the fence
Hoppin' all night it don't make no sense (na na)
From New York to Cali', whylin' (wild)
I got the bitch in the alley howlin' (beitch)
And she don't wanna go nowhere
She got love for a player she don't know no better
That's why I tell her (tell her)
I'd be wid you forever if I could find time to put you
in my schedule (beitch)
Beitch, $hort Dog in the house

Chorus x2

[Ol' Dirty Bastard]
She flew in like calm breeze
Tall brown skin, her weave like palm trees
I went coconuts
Dipped my Dunkin' between your Donut
Don't want it if it ain't no slut, bitch!
Fathership touch ground, like fly on soup
Don't invite me I tear the fuck down
White boys cut my toupee!
Seventh day rester, or scream play
I slump MC slay, it ain't nuttin to bust ass
Bullet him, get him fast
Bitch I don't break out, blast to the next rash
The dog piss on MC's like trees
Got meals but still grill that old good welfare cheese

Chorus x2Artist: Ol' Dirty Bastard f/ Buddha Monk
Album:  Trials & Tribulations of Russell Jones
Song:   Here Comes the Judge
Typed by: KnowledgeGod@btinternet.com, ThaMasta@Rogers.Com

[Intro: Ol' Dirty Bastard {Buddha Monk}]
I was drivin' an Accord cart, nominated at awards
Back in the days drivin' an Accord
Run-uhhn-uuhhn-uhhn, nominated at awards
Back in the days drivin' an Accord
Everybody rise (Wu-Tang)
(This slang) You know (this rhyme) you came to America
(that's our thang)
(I hang) And took over the black woman (and her reply)
(Is slang) The black woman wanted the Judge
They runnin' from the cops
They run, runnin', run, runnin', runnin', runnin'
Here Comes the Judge (x8)
{Give it to me now}

[Ol' Dirty Bastard (girl)]
Here comes my Mac
I don't need this shit owned by stack
I don't need you to monitor my perimeter (I wanna car for mine)
Got me Accord, take me to judge
{*sniff*} Sittin' broke
Nominated at awards
Back in the days drivin' Accords
I didn't have nothing to give
I didn't have no life to live
Bastard C'Mon
Aaahhhhhhhhaahhhhhhh

[Break: Buddha Monk (Ol' Dirty Bastard)]
Hey hey excuse me Russell Jones
Will you please calm down and tell the story?
Just the story (heh heh)
We want nothing else, just the story
(No disrespect Judge)
(Police-police-police)
(Police-police-police)
(Dirty ass, Dirty ass, Dirty ass)
	"I come camoflauged" --> Zoo Keeper
(Dirty scorpian)
	"Uh uh Judge you oughta peep me, sir don't you
remember me"
		"No who are you boy?"
	"Well I'm the baller that introduced you to your wife"
		"To my wife? Get a life you son of a bitch"

[Buddha Monk]
Yo, start the attack with dirt up cats thats wack
Wants to be a gun blazer but jacks the flavor tracks
I numb out frames, don't blame it on the coccaine
What is sure to be the blame is the bullets of which you obtained
Zoo or Zi Tribe and will live to be trifle
News stands everywhere shows Zoo homicidal
Extra extra read all about it
Dirt Dog's Dirty cousin kills off Franklin and Madison
This Dirty hiphop, tryna stop the raw lights
Zu shoot down on the block, I need beamie of Scotch
Block is mad hot, bad boys want their fuckin hollar
Asked for Information, got it from a bitch named Tmara
Click click, a bloaw bloaw bloaw
Wish y'all woulda crawled with her
Would have killed that bitch off, and fucked her ugly daughter
Hahaahhhahaaa

[Outro: Judge]
Mr. Russell Jones and Mr Ellery Chambers
Would you please stand
The court finds you guilty as charged
I am the honorable Judge Pigmy
No longer will you make a mockery of the justice system
The honourable Judge Pigmy
As spoken
I sentence you to life
Hahahahaha
I have the knowledge
I am the Judge (x8)Artist: Ol' Dirty Bastard f/ Royal Flush
Album:  Trials & Tribulations of Russell Jones
Song:   I Wanna Fuck
Typed by: KnowledgeGod@btinternet.com

[Intro: Ol' Dirty Bastard]
Yo, I got love for you girls
All my Sweet Suger Pies
This is dedicated to youuuu

[Royal Flush]
Hey baby what's your name? Look at your whole frame
Compliment me on my chain, she bling it so I did the same
Where we goin' from here? Lets smoke and drink in Belverdere
Askin' me about my peers, where I been for all these years
Starin' at my car yeah, notice money round here
Please baby show your speed, nuff talk about me
Where you work? What's your hobby?
Married, or got kids to some bonnie
Famous for karate
What's your number, call you probably
Waited for a week ot two, didn't see what we gon' do
Came through, new car XL on them 22's
Knock and marry, straight to her I wanna hit it badly
Then she startin' barkin', said "first we gotta get married"
I hate this bitch, all I wanna do is hit the nappy
Gassed her head up, tell her anything tha make her happy
Straight to the hotel, she suck dick and fuck well
Asked me for my house number, I gave her Ol' Dirty's cell

[Chorus: singer]
When I'm sippin' on the henny, make me wanna fuck,
wanna fuck, wanna fuck
When I'm thinkin' of them bitches I don't fall in
love, fall in love, fall in love
All I ever do is get high and fuck, bust a nut, bust a nut
ODB and Royal Flush don't give a fuck, bitches what?

[Ol' Dirty Bastard]
If a girl is a slut, with a hole in her butt
Who used to be a meaty-bone puppy cow little mutt
Came to my house smellin like trout
I said, "Doggie doggie get the fuck out!!"
Let me tell you about the rash from the neck
it's enough to put the ring around the collar in check
She's nothin but a bitch other known as a witch
with an irritating ITCH from trying to switch
Strung out ass, foggin up glass
Tellin all the niggas that the bitch first class
Smoke a bag of hash with the money she stash
Tear up the whiff, that appear in her Tabernacle Prayer
But the only thing holy was her shitty underwear

Chorus

[Royal Flush]
Head anytime I wannit, C-O 600
World my state stuttin', girls come in diamond dozen
Fuck hard, niece and cousins, doin' what your niggas wouldn't
Fattin' like the white guttin', 85 I put my foot in
Buck Scotties still pimpin', stay puttin' long dick in
White pussy our commission, hit it while you when out fishin'
Dog I be fuckin' bitches, while you be duckin' stitches
And don't think cuz I'm a mack I won't buck at bitches
Mad cuz my chain is bigger, rims look a little thicker
Lifetsyle's alot richer, you actin' like low hitchin'
Get a heater on my strippers, maybe y'all gon' hit it
No rhymin', dance in a minute
cuz everybody that I popped tonight at least had 3 E's in it..
3 E's in it

Chorus x2Artist: Ol' Dirty Bastard f/ Brooklyn Zoo, Popa Chief, Sunz of Man
Album:  Trials & Tribulations of Russell Jones
Song:   Lintballz
Typed by: KnowledgeGod@btinternet.com, ThaMasta@Rogers.Com

[Intro: Zoo Keeper (Popa Chief) {Ol' Dirty Bastard}]
*Popa Chief singing "Do or die, do or die, do or die,
do or die" throughout intro*
(What's your move bitch nigga?)
Suttin' ain't goin' down like that
I ain't lettin' niggas know they ain't know
(How you gonna get what you ain't got?
You know what I'm sayin'?) You ain't gonna get it
(Yeah) That's the way it's goin' down
(Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah) Fuckin' around
{Yo I mastered the art of Shadowboxin'!}

[Chorus x2: Popa Chief]
Do or die, ball or fly
Lintballz always hangin' around tryin' to get high
But fuck sittin' around waitin' on a hook up
It's time to turn the heat up
And catch these papes like cooked up
What?

[12 O'Clock]
Niggas waitin' for hook up, get shook up
Never get your weight off and do a push up
You smokin' all my purple kush up
Don't make me push and rook up
Get you touched up, I lift my wrist up, yup, yup
Now niggas know Lil' Diggs, only twice wore a suit
Had sex in a group with a couple of bitches dance for loot
See I'ma tell them niggas about spendin' all they loot
Partyin' and trickin' on bitches and don't recoup
I got my own version of roots
Cracker ass nigga pickin' cotton and polishin' my Brooklyn Zoo boots
The new news is Brooklyn Zoo
Sunz and Two On Da Road, Blue, Crazy Cuffie Fam too

[Prodical]
Yo, I ain't tryin' to be on no forever broke shit
So I made myself eatin' these streets where blood leak
Me and my whole fleet smoke trees, blow heat, roll unique
Do or die tactics, and keep us sharp on our feet, meak
And all we do is make classics, CCF, the Unit
Dirt Dog, the Zoo, Ghetto Government, get your ratchet
95% of them niggas is faggots, and I've had it up to here
See our face this year, appear
on your TV screen, we stay green
Money makes the world go around, know what I mean-ean?
New team, fresh and clean clean on your scene
Now sing along, sing along, y'all know the theme-heme

[Popa Chief {*singing*}]
Now do or die, do or die, do or die, do or die (aarrgh, wooh)
Now do or die, do or die, do or die, do or die (oohhh)

[Hell Razah]
Yeah, bitches wanna bone a nigga when your records is sellin'
Labels don't play a nigga when they nuttin' but felons
Young Razah got that hot shit that's under the Heavens
GG'z poppin' grey goose feathers
Prostitute cheddar, crashin' in whips with new leathers
Bad models be on the dick that shy and strip
Thinkin' we some gangsters, thugs, Bloods or Crips
Watch who you sleep, shake hands and hustle with
Why dream to be rich when I'm already rich?
Two bars I spit got the hottest nigga pissed
Chicks kiss the diamonds that twist on our wrist
Brooklyn Zoo, S.O.M., Dirty Bast' shit, nigga

Chorus x2

[Ol' Dirty Bastard (Buddha Monk)]
I whip a nigga ass on hand and hand, you get flashed
Whatever you do, I stop your ass
My name is Isis, I kill you with a hiss
I kill you with my motherfuckin' piss
A matter of fact you kill yourself, nigga I crash ya stealth
(See let a nigga come through with that bullshit)
Yeah we ain't sayin nuttin'
I never was familiar with bein' pussy
I loved that shit 'til it's bloody

[Buddha Monk]
Hey yo hold up, you told me you liked that shit muddy and swampy
And you gonna hit it from where (from the back door)
This Fam right here, is the Fam right here
And if you fuck with the Zoo you gon' get clapped right there
For this CREAM nigga, I'll walk through Muddy Waters
If he be call out, and rob your son and daughter
Lintballz in my pocket and yours is real lumby
Nah, Lay Down, gimme what you got G
Split the pie three ways, live off it for three days
And when it's done, who's the next victim today
I'm trife nigga, and I don't live by BIBLE life 
I yap the nigga ripe then stash a nigga right
Yeah I did wanna do it and the Devil didn't make me
Linballz in my pocket that made me stick them G'z
Checkmate, pray to the Lord, your soul He take
Then I hip into the rob for my Fam I just got 'im, nigga

Chorus x2

[Outro: Brooklyn Zoo {Popa Chief}]
Yeah yeah, huh huh (motherfucker)
That's right, that's right, OK (alright)
Yeah so {now you be knowin'}
{Annihilate}
{Get some papes like Bill Gates}Artist: Ol' Dirty Bastard
Album:  Trials & Tribulations of Russell Jones
Song:   Reunited
Typed by: ThaMasta@Rogers.Com

[Chorus: Ol' Dirty Bastard *singin*]
Reunited cuz it feels so good 
Reunited cuz we're understood
There's one perfect thing
and children this one is it
We both we're so excited cuz
we're reunited, hey! hey!

[Ol' Dirty Bastard]
I'm known on the microphone as the rap professor
Casual dresser, you may dress fresher
The way that I speak this shit is energetic
My physique of meat is quick atheletic
Remove all MC's who disapprove
that my funky fresh particle always have the groove
You're jealous over me because you're not a competitor
You're just a donor, I'm the rap editor
Tryin to rock the mic when you get an appetite
All negative on the mic, I dislike
Try to rock the mic but only will reduce
Try to get loose, you juice as a youth
Not knowin to yourself that you shall be frozen
I'm the MC warrior, who has been chosen
to rock and shock beats, polite when I recite
Sulfur MC's, you are down right, out right
Try to be talkative, there's no alternative
Hide until I forgive, this motive
I am unique with the perfected physique
The objective of my rhyme is my own technique
I maintain the paradise on this Earth
with the shut the fuck up style for what this shit is worth
Watch a nigga catch a purse
Super-hero niggaz die
Do my dirt, get away and multiply
You bitches, ya nice guys
Always want bitch, because ya need mine
I pleased on how I get up on the stage and fuck up the show
Cuz nobody can't fuck with me!
You bootleggin buyin motherfuckers, don't do that with me
with all these child-support cases I got, I needs my money!
Earl for ages, a 100 and down, sacrifice ya baby to the underground
The best kept secret, how does it feel to be
boxin in like a skeleton, growin back ya skin?
When I was young, I was taught how to produce
the science of babies gettin loose
I turned white boys to Springsteen spruce
Black to spooks, gave the Chinese Bruce
I can't help it if my style is foggy, monster boogie
Get ya high on my patio, all come to see me movie
Bicthes, you're walkin on my dirt
We ain't sayin nuthin
I whisper in ya ear, make ya blink cold Pert
Love potion, plenty bones I put up
What!? What!? What!? What!?
You know what time it is,
mothefuckers!

[Chorus]

[Outro: Ol' Dirty Bastard]
I want to give a big shout out to the Wu-Tang Clan
We holdin it down. YouknowI'msayin?
I also want to show mad love to Puffy cuz you holdin it down
Master P, you holdin it down
KnowI'msayin? Dr.Dre, you holdin it down
Give Snoop my love, E-40
MC Eiht, West Coast, word is bond
This is family, I don't give a fuck!
Striaght up. It's Dirt Dog, nigga!
Y'all niggaz know how the fuck I get down!
knowI'msayin? I'm here to represent this shit!
KnowImean? I love y'all niggaz!
Motherfucker, my stomach hurts!
Bitch, I got to go!
(ah, Wu-Tang motherfuckers...)Artist: Ol' Dirty Bastard
Album:  Trials & Tribulations of Russell Jones
Song:   Zoo Two
Typed by: ThaMasta@Rogers.Com

[Ol Dirty Bastard]
I'll grab and the mic and now I damage you, cut your whole stamina
Here comes the medical examiner
One verse then you're out for the count
(Bring the ammonia) make sure he sniffs the right amount
Wake him up and then I ask him
Why did he intend this --
competition to get an ass kickin so tremendous
Boy you shouldn't bother this
Leave me alone like the (son said G or he'll be fatherless!)
I got the asiatic flow mixed with disco
Roll up on the scene like the Count of Monte Crisco
and MC's start to vanish
(I stepped up to a jet black kid, started speakin spanish!
 Yo he wasn't from Panama
 I asked him how he get so dark, the nigga said suntama!
 He responded so fast, you made me laugh)
Ha-ha-ha, HARARRRH (then I scared-his ass!)
(Kick the hundred strongest rhymes 
 I brought out the punk in him
 Caught him with a strong five deadly venom
 Told him enter the Wu-Tang
 Witness the Shaolin slang, that'll crush the shit you bring)
I watch your ass take a big fall, why?!
My Main Source, is like a friendly game of stickball
And as you step up to bat man (I play the riddler)
You try to do me for a rhyme (then I'll change to Hitler)
Go out like Nazi; you'll be wishin your fuckin ass
stayed home and played (Yahtzee!)
Or watchin Happy Days sweatin (Poxie)
with Ralphie and Richie Cunningham, Joni and (Chachi)
Wu, who? Me gettin wreck so I'm through
Like a ten and a half foot, gettin in a seven (shoe)
(Now picture THAT with a Minolta)
Have your ass doin some Night Fever shit like John Travolta
I come strong I make knowledge born, I flip the script
and rock on from P.M. (past the fucking Dawn)
Pass the Hammer you're broke down, niggaz grab my what what
Can't understand it here's the panaroma
(A complete view of how I defeat you)
Should of stepped to those fuckin kids who tried to (beat you)
Yeah I bust that ass before
(You ran to Texas and came back but forgot the chainsaw!)
And want to perform a massacre
Better be coming with some motherfucking shit that's spectacular
Crush the person who did em, well you just better
So I'm stepping to your (raggedy ass jetta)
Put the pedal to the metal
You and your DJ change your name to Ma and Pa Kettle
as I (pass the bone, kicks your every measure)
It's not a Newport but it's still live with pleasure
(C'mon don't be silly, just a bag of sensimilli
 Rolled up in a) Motown Philly
(I used to write all the time when I smoked
 Grab the mic, then I kinda like went for broke
 With visually concepts strongest rhymes and biceps
 Lyrically speakin, three to four rhymes then choke
 Some think they be harmin this, claimin they be bombin this)
But they still remains a-nom-ynous
I pull strings like Jimi Hendrix
Ride more beats that go backs to the days of Eddie Kendricks
I teach the truth to the youth, I say (hey youth)
Here's the truth, better start wearing (bullet proof)
Arm yourself with a shield
(Before you get trapped up) just like the Children in the Cornfield